THE MEASUREMENT OF ECONOMIC PERFORMANCE
AND SOCIAL PROGRESS REVISITED

OFCE
N° 2009-33
DECEMBER 2009

Professor Joseph E. Stiglitz
Chair, Columbia University

Professor Amartya Sen
Chair Adviser, Harvard University

Professor Jean-Paul Fitoussi
Coordinator of the Commission, IEP

OFCE - Centre de recherche en économie de Sciences Po
69, quai d’Orsay - 75340 Paris Cedex 07 - Tél/ 01 44 18 54 00 - Fax/ 01 45 56 06 15

www.ofce.sciences-po.fr

The Measurement of Economic
Performance and Social Progress
Revisited

Reflections and Overview
Joseph STIGLITZ, Amartya SEN and Jean-Paul FITOUSSI

www.stiglitz-sen-fitoussi.fr

Prolegomena
THE MULTIPLE PURPOSES OF MEASUREMENT

1.

In February 2008, the President of the French Republic, Nicholas Sarkozy, unsatisfied
with the present state of statistical information about the economy and the society, asked,
Joseph Stiglitz (President of the Commission), Amartya Sen (Advisor) and Jean Paul
Fitoussi (Coordinator) to create a Commission, subsequently called “The Commission
on the Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress” (CMEPSP). The
Commission’s aim has been to identify the limits of GDP as an indicator of economic
performance and social progress, including the problems with its measurement, to
consider what additional information might be required for the production of more
relevant indicators of social progress, to assess the feasibility of alternative measurement
tools, and to discuss how to present the statistical information in an appropriate way.

2.

The Commission reviewed the purposes to be served by systems of measurement of
economic performance and social progress, and the extent to which current systems serve
these purposes.

3.

The purposes of our statistical systems are multiple, and a metric that is adapted to one
purpose may be ill suited to another. Sometimes confusion is engendered when a measure
adapted to one purpose is used to highlight another. For example, GDP is neither a
measure of income nor a measure of well-being. What we want to measure is the key
question. We may want to measure, for instance, the levels of market activity—one of the
original objectives of national income measurement. But increasingly, there is a demand
to go beyond measures of market activity to measures of well-being. Whatever it is that
we want to measure, we can measure the flows (for instance, the level of production and/
or income) during a given time interval, say a year. We may measure changes in those
flows, say their rate of growth over time. We may want to compare levels of income
across countries or we may be interested in international comparisons of countries’
growth rates.

4.

It is important to distinguish between these different purposes, since they are affected
differently by the various shortcomings of national accounts. For example, measuring the
level of production requires a direct measure of government output. But while the
adoption of direct measures of government output has been used to give a better measure
of growth rates, to date there have been few attempts to adjust the measured levels of
national income. To measure changes in levels through time requires distinguishing price
and quantity effects, which in turn implies the capacity to measure quality changes.

5.

There are long recognized problems in GDP as a measure of economic performance, but
many of the changes in the structure of our society have made these deficiencies of

The Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress Revisited

REFLECTIONS AND OVERVIEW

greater consequence. At the same time, advances both in our conceptual understanding
of the issues and data availability mean that it is now possible to construct better
indicators. Better indicators might be able to address one of the concerns that motivated
this report: a marked distance between standard measures of important socio economic
variables like economic growth, inflation, unemployment, etc. and widespread
perceptions
6.

International comparisons of levels and more importantly of rates of growth play a very
important role in the design of policy. Comparisons are indeed possible if the procedures
and definitions used to compute the accounts are comparable. Yet there are still “large
differences in the ways National Accounts calculations are carried out even among
European countries, let alone between Europe and the U.S1”. This may have farreaching consequences. It makes no sense, for instance, to structural reforms intended to
import the “best practice” of the country performing the best in terms of growth rate, if
the growth rates of the two countries differ mainly because of differences in the ways
National Accounts are computed.

7.

Policies have also been affected by widespread statistical analyses of the determinants of
growth and economic performance; but inferences made from those statistical studies
may be flawed if the measures themselves are flawed. Those conducting this research
and relying on these results must be well informed concerning the limitations of our
statistics on which they are based.

8.

But what is of particular concern is when narrow measures of market performance are
confused with broader measures of welfare. What we measure affects what we do; and if
our measurements are flawed, decisions may be distorted. Policies should be aimed at
increasing societal welfare, not GDP. Choices between promoting GDP and protecting
the environment may be false choices, once environmental degradation is appropriately
included in our measurement of economic performance. This report, building on
extensive earlier work, describes the additions and subtractions that can and should be
made to provide a better measure of welfare.

9.

Advances in research across a number of disciplines enables, however, the development
of broader, more encompassing measures of well being. Some of these dimensions are
reflected in traditional statistics, but are given more prominence: unemployment has an
effect on well-being that goes well beyond the loss of income to which it gives rise. Other
dimensions to which we call attention are health, education, security, and socialconnectedness. These dimensions affect the capabilities of people which depend on the
extent of their opportunity set and of their freedom to choose among this set, the live they
value2. Some economic reforms in recent years may have increased GDP, but their
adverse effects on these other dimensions on Quality of Life are unmistable.

10. We care about the future—that the living standards that we enjoy today should be enjoyed
by future generations. Our statistical systems should tell us whether or not what we are
doing is sustainable, economically, environmentally, politically, or socially. There is
1.
2.

4

Joachen Hartwig (2005): “On Misusing National Account Data for Governance Purposes », Working paper 05-101, KOF
Swiss Economic Institute, ETH, Zurich.
Amartya Sen: “Well Being, Agency and Freedom: the Dewey Lectures, 1984”, The Journal of Philosophy, 82, 169-221,
1985.

The Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress Revisited

reason to believe that, at least in certain dimensions, what we are doing is not
sustainable, but current statistics do not reflect this—just as they gave little indication of
the unsustainability of the U.S. economic growth in the years preceding the crisis.
11. There is no single indicator that can capture something as complex as our society. But
because what we choose to measure and how we construct our measures can have such
an important role in the decisions that are made, it is important that there be an open and
public discussion of our system of metrics. Hopefully, this Report will play a role in this
Public Dialogue.

I - Uses and Misuses of GDP
1.

Between the time we began working on this Report and the time we completed it, the
economic context has radically changed. We are now living through one of the worst
financial, economic and social crises in history. Part of the reason why the crisis took
many with such surprise is that the “measurement” systems we use to assess and
monitor economic performance failed. They suggested that in the years prior to the
crisis the economy was doing far better than it was. The crisis has raised questions of
how to value assets – if we value the houses produced back then at current market
prices, output at that time would be much lower. So too for the profits recorded by one
of the seemingly most dynamic sectors of the economy, the financial sector, which were
not just ephemeral, but, in many cases, based on suspect valuations. Not only have
questions been raised about the assessment of the economic performance of these firms,
but because GDP, our standard measure of national economic performance, reflects the
sum total of the economic performance of all firms in the economy, questions are being
raised about the assessment of national economic performance.

2.

No single measure, or even a limited set of measures, can provide all the information
required to assess and manage an economy. But many are asking today, why did neither
the private accounting system nor the public one deliver an adequate early warning? It is
perhaps going too far to hope that if we had possessed a better measurement system, one
that would have signaled problems ahead, government might have taken early measures
to avoid or at least to mitigate the present turmoil. But perhaps had there been more
awareness of the limitations of standard metrics, like GDP, there would have been less
euphoria over economic performance in the years prior to the crisis; metrics that
incorporated assessments of sustainability (e.g. increasing indebtedness) would have
provided a more cautious view of economic performance. In effect, sustainability
issues, in a broad sense, apply not only to the environment and to natural resources, but
also to other types of capital.

3.

Often, the requisite information is available somewhere within our statistical apparatus,
but because it is not given sufficient prominence, it is overlooked. To some extent, that
was true for this crisis: data about increasing household indebtedness was available3.

3.

Although, the level of housing prices was so high, that the inference that this indebtedness was sustainable was common.

5

REFLECTIONS AND OVERVIEW

But the excessive focus on GDP metrics—and a failure to understand the limitations of
that measure-- meant that these statistics were not given the prominence they deserved.
At other times, information is subject to alternative interpretations.
4.

Even prior to the crisis, many concerned about the degradation of the environment or
the depletion of natural resources argued that national accounts gave a false impression
of economic performance, as they measured the “goods” being produced, but not the
“bads”. They worried that growth statistics did not include an adequate appraisal of its
sustainability4. If we take a broader view of sustainability and include other assets, such
as human capital and social cohesion, information is simply missing.

5.

This dramatic episode is teaching us a very important lesson: Those attempting to guide
the economy are like pilots steering a course without a reliable compass. The decisions
we make depend on what we measure, how we do our measurements, and how we
interpret them. We are almost “flying blind” when the metrics on which action is based
are ill-designed. Today, there is a broad consensus that we need better metrics and that
we need to understand the limitations and uses of existing metrics.

6.

Statisticians, economists and governments have, of course, long been concerned with
the many shortcomings of our statistical systems. Many of the issues we will discuss in
this overview are longstanding issues, which were already raised by those very scholars
who helped to build the present System of National Accounts. The joke of Professor
Paul Samuelson (one of the great modern economists, and winner of the 1970 Nobel
Prize) is known by almost all generations of students since the 1950s: “what happens to
the GDP when a professor marries his servant?” William Nordhaus and James Tobin of
Yale University (winner of the 1981 Nobel Price) in a famous paper published in 19735
highlighted many of the problems that still lie before us. Since then, these problems
have been further investigated, and we have drawn extensively on the large and
important literature that deals with them.

7.

Moreover, reflecting many of the same concerns which motivated this Commission,
work has been undertaken on the measurement of economic performance and social
progress by the OECD, EU and UN. The references to the literature and to these works
appear in the technical chapters of this Report, and they have been an important source
for the work of the Commission. It is not just that the Commission’s work does not exist
in a vacuum; it is precisely because there is such interest in these issues that we believe
that the timing of the work of the Commission is opportune. We hope our Report will
provide further impetus to meet the difficult tasks ahead.

8.

In this overview we will attempt to give a flavour of these problems, while at the same
time emphasizing the difficulty of constructing alternative measures. In writing our
Report, we do not underestimate the sophistication and seriousness of current national
income accounting practices, nor the difficulties facing attempts to make improvements.
There are nearly always good reasons for the imperfect compromises that are made in
constructing the accounts. But while those compromises may make sense for one

4.

A very small number of countries have wealth accounts. The third chapter of this Report tackles the issue of valuing assets
(wealth) and changes in wealth, which is at the core of assessing sustainability.
Nordhaus, W. and J. Tobin (1973), “Is Growth Obsolete?” in The Measurement of Economic and Social Performance,
National Bureau of Economic Research, 1973

5.

6

The Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress Revisited

purpose, they may not be the best or most appropriate compromise for others, as the
following discussion should help to clarify. And those who use these statistics, whether
they are scholars attempting to understand better the determinants of economic
performance or politicians attempting to shape policies that will ameliorate existing
societal problems and lead, more broadly, to social progress, must understand better the
limitations of these indicators.
9.

The purpose of this Report is to take stock of what has already been done, to assess the
weaknesses (and strengths) of current metrics, and to propose some modifications to the
existing statistical apparatus. In doing so, we attempt to reflect the growing concerns of
citizens throughout the world about quality of life – its objective as well as its subjective
determinants6 – and the sustainability of growth and the environment. We hope too that
this Report will promote greater understanding of the assumptions that underlie the
construction of these metrics as well as their consequent limitations, and that it will give
a renewed impetus for the many initiatives attempting to improve our metrics and the
data on which they rest.

10.

Statistical systems are tools for economic management, but they serve a multiplicity of
objectives. Our statistical systems were originally created to provide an assessment of
the performance of the market economy, and, particularly, to monitor cyclical
fluctuations. This is still a critical function. But the metrics developed for this purpose
are often used (or misused) as a measure of societal well-being. This would be justified
only under a set of very specific – and most often unrealistic – assumptions. One of the
purposes of this Report is to bring to the fore the problems in doing this, and to suggest
alternative measures that might more adequately reflect broader notions of societal
well-being and social progress. National income accountants have already, in fact,
constructed a variety of measures, and we hope our Report will provide some guidance
to the appropriate use of each, along with greater awareness of their respective
limitations.

11.

In our review of existing metrics, we will discuss (a) some of the areas in which our
metrics are incomplete, leaving outside measurement some important phenomena like
the environment, home production etc.; (b) the defects of some existing measures.
While sometimes the information required to construct a better metric is not available,
in other instances it is.

12.

Thus, our Report is simultaneously a plea for revisions of our national account system, a
call for the end of the dominant use of GDP in assessing everything – performance,
well-being, quality of life, etc. – and an appeal for the gathering of more information
that would enable us to assess and monitor economic performance and social progress
better, so as to reflect those things that citizens care about.

6.

The development of the capability approach by Amartya Sen emphasizes the objective determinants of the quality of life,
without reducing the measure of the quality of life to those determinants. Cf. Sen A. (1999), Development as Freedom,
Oxford University Press, Delhi.

7

REFLECTIONS AND OVERVIEW

I-1 Measuring Economic Performance
13.

It has become a commonplace to say that it is important to monitor and assess
performance, whether of firms or countries or individuals. This is especially the case as
our societies have become more performance-oriented. We expect results, whether from
our managers, our workers, or our politicians. Individual rewards are typically based on
performance, and incentive systems have to be based on metrics. What we measure
affects, of course, what we do. And what individually or collectively we are aiming at
affects what we measure. There is an intricate relationship between objectives,
measures and actions. If teachers are rewarded for their students’ performance on
reading test scores, they will teach reading, perhaps at the expense of broader cognitive
skills.

14.

So too for countries. Politicians are asked to guide the collective actions of society,
whether through regulations, taxes, or expenditures. But towards what ends? They are
told to increase GDP. But they are also told to pay attention to many aspects of the
quality of life – from social justice and urban amenities to noise, air, and water
pollution. The two sometimes seem contradictory – paying attention to social objectives
sometimes seems to run counter to pursuing economic objectives. But that should not
necessarily be the case. Economic activities are not so much an end in themselves, but a
means to an end – to higher living standards. If our indicators suggest that pursuing
actions directed at improving living standards, broadly defined, have an adverse effect
on the economy, perhaps the problem is with our economic measurements.

15.

The apparent contradiction between the different objectives alluded to in the preceding
paragraph is as old as the post-World War II system of National Accounts itself. In
effect, while national income measurement had its origin in macroeconomic accounting,
stemming from the work of Keynes and Kuznets, there was another, often more
theoretical literature, which focused on the measurement of welfare, and whose
theoretical underpinning may be found in the work of Pigou, Hicks and Samuelson.7
There is tension between these two strands, which may lead to conflicting views about
the treatment of some aspects of the economy, for example, the government sector.8 But
this tension has perhaps increased through time as the economy became more complex,
and measurement of non-market phenomena – in particular, the increased provision by
the state of public goods and services – became more important for a fair account of
economic activity. But if the public debate and a number of remarks in this overview are
leaning towards welfare measurement as a primary purpose, that does not mean that we
propose to dispense with macroeconomic accounting. On the contrary, we think that the
role of accounts in macroeconomic management is, has been, and will remain essential.
Indeed, we have entitled the first part of this Report, in which we discuss how we might
improve the measurement of the economy’s output “Classical GDP issues”.

16.

There are other reasons for dissatisfaction with our system of economic measurements.
They often seem out of touch with our perceptions. Government statisticians may

7.
8.

8

Arthur C. Pigou (1920), The Economics of Welfare, MacMillan; John R. Hicks (1940), “The valuation of social income”,
Economica, vol.7, pp. 105-24; Paul A. Samuelson (1947), Foundations of Economic Analysis, Harvard University Press.
There is a deeper conflict – most of the literature in the Pigou tradition assumes markets that function well, while the macroeconomic literature is concerned about valuation in situations where there is a deep “market failure”, which can lead to
persistent unemployment and excess capacity. These market failures play a central role in the discussion below.

The Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress Revisited

correctly announce that the rate of inflation has been “only” 3%, but an important
fraction of citizens may feel that their own costs of living are going up far faster. They
may be told that the country is experiencing a rapid increase in economic performance,
and yet there may be a widespread perception that living standards are going down.
17.

Such disparities between what government agencies say and what individuals feel or
know about their own status contributes to public distrust of government, and of societal
institutions more generally. If the measurement system which is supposed to give a
broad account of the situation is incongruent with people’s own perceptions, they may
have the feeling that the statistics that used to describe what is happening in our society
are being manipulated, in an attempt to manipulate the democratic processes, and as a
consequence they may lose confidence in democracy itself. (We should emphasize that,
in most cases, the government is not in fact engaged in such manipulation; it is simply
that, especially in circumstances where there is less than full confidence in government,
views that this is the case may become widespread.9) That could have far-reaching
consequences. It is why governments in many countries and especially in Europe have
taken the problem seriously, and rightly so. In the last few years, a number of official
reports have addressed the measurement of inflation and living standards to respond to
the heated debate about their measurement and about alleged underestimations by
statistical offices.10 Other countries have attempted to construct broader measures of
social progress that are more reflective of societal values, paying more attention to the
environment, for instance.11

18.

It is thus important to know the reason for these disparities, and to address them. There
may be a simple explanation – the benefits of an increase in GDP may be going to a
relatively few individuals, with most individuals in society actually being worse-off. If
that is the case (and it is, in many countries12), then it suggests that greater attention be
paid to metrics of societal performance other than average per-capita income, to metrics
that are more congruent with widespread perceptions of well-being. It is theoretically
easy to construct such measures. Median disposable income describes the income of the
“representative individual” – representative in the sense that half the individuals have a
higher income, half a lower income. It is thus a good candidate. But as Chapter 1 of the
main Report shows, such a construction is complex as it has to rely on data other than
those used in the national accounts, and it may be difficult to make this data consistent
with the underlying national accounts. Nonetheless, it is essential to create such

9.

Of course, there may have been attempts to manipulate accounts. There are allegations that in Argentina under government
pressure, the official statistical agency published inflation rates that were much lower than they actually were. Today, the
government has to address a very serious credibility problem in the release of economic performance indicators. In other
cases, decisions to reform national accounts are in part motivated by the consequences of flawed measurements;
overestimating inflation may lead to larger increases in payments that are indexed to inflation. When governments seek to
reduce budgetary outlays because of large budgetary deficits, it is understandable that those adversely affected by the
statistical reforms become suspect, whether or not those suspicions are justified.
10. Controversies over the measurement of inflation have been particularly intense in the United States (see, e.g. the so called
Boskin Report: Boskin, Michael J., E. Dulberger, R. Gordon, Z. Griliches, and D. Jorgenson (1996), “Toward a More
Accurate Measure of the Cost of Living”, Final Report to the US Senate Finance Committee, December 4.) and in
Argentina.
11. Particularly noteworthy is the work of Bhutan’s government, which has been active in its search for better measurements
of societal well-being, as it has attempted to develop a measure of GNH, gross national happines
12. A recent study by the IMF made this point very clearly: “Based on observed movements in Gini coefficients (the most
widely used summary measure of inequality) inequality has risen in all but the low income country aggregate over the past
two decades, although there are significant regional and country differences”. World Economic Outlook, October 2007.

9

REFLECTIONS AND OVERVIEW

measures, if we are to obtain a picture of what is happening to most individuals in our
society. (More generally, there are many reasons why it is desirable to try to construct
income distribution data. This has been done recently by a few statistical offices, in
particular France’s INSEE.)
19.

On the other hand, the explanation for disparities in perception may be more complex.
There may be technical problems with how we measure health and education, two
sectors of increasing importance (together, in the US, they comprise close to a third of
GDP); or it may be that our measures leave out something important, like our sense of
security, or include some expenditures that individuals do not think of as important to
their sense of well-being.13

20.

The risk is that, as countries strive to increase measured GDP, they take actions which
now, or in the future, may actually lower societal well-being. This is especially the case
if our metrics do not take account of sustainability, if current consumption puts in
jeopardy, for instance, future living standards. The most obvious cases involve
depletion of resources and the degradation of the environment. Countries that enjoy
high living standards today by depleting their inheritance of natural resources – without
investing the proceeds – are “robbing” future generations. It is possible that doing this
does not even increase their welfare, as people usually care about the well-being of their
children, but they may unintentionally act this way, at least partially because they are
not informed, absent the right metric.

21.

The world as a whole has put the planet at risk, as emissions of greenhouse gases lead to
global warming, with potential catastrophic effects, at least for some countries. We
know that the way we, as an international community, have conducted ourselves is not
sustainable. We know that it is impossible for the world, as we know it, to survive if
current patterns of living and production continue, and even more so if they are
extended to the billions in the developing world. Yet, some, even in the richest country
of the world, claim that were they to change, we would pay an economic price. Clearly,
our metrics are faulty: our measures should tell us that what we are doing today is not
sustainable, that current consumption is at least partly at the expense of future
generations; in that sense we may be living beyond our means. Better metrics would
indicate higher sustainable incomes from altering patterns of consumption and
production in ways that reduce emissions.

22.

This is not the only example of non-sustainability. Argentina’s overall growth in the
early 1990s was based, in part, on the growth of consumption, and the growth of
consumption was based, in turn, on borrowing from abroad. On the basis of standard
metrics, it appeared as if the economy was performing well. Yet better metrics would
have reflected the increased indebtedness; it would have suggested that the country’s
growth might not have been sustainable. So too the US, and indeed many of the
advanced industrial countries, experienced unsustainable growth in the middle of this
decade. Again, growth was based on borrowing. In the US, the borrowing supported an
unsustainable housing bubble that led the country to believe that it was wealthier than it

13.

10

There may be “psychological” problems: in forming their beliefs about inflation, individuals may pay more attention to
increases in the products of certain commodities that seem particularly salient than their weight in their market basket might
indicate. Later, we will emphasize that individual’s sense of well-being may be affected by being unemployed in a way that
is greater than can be accounted for by the loss in income.

The Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress Revisited

was and that it could accordingly live beyond its means. It borrowed hundreds of
billions of dollars from abroad, not for productive investment, but for a consumption
binge. The standard metrics, however, provided no warning sign, no reliable measure of
sustainable consumption. Not surprisingly, nothing was done to curb the excesses. One
may object that these episodes were the consequence, not of the metric by itself, but of
the fact that in both cases the relevant metric was ignored. After all, data on
indebtedness are not lacking! The analysis was faulty, not the metric. But in fact in both
cases the data were also telling us that the wealth of the country was increasing and thus
that growth was sustainable. This emphasizes the need for better measures, or
indicators, of sustainability.
23.

One of the consequences of using incomplete metrics may be wrong inferences about
what are good policies and practices. While greater reliance on quantitative methods in
economics and other social sciences has led to increasing use of metrics in analytic
studies (e.g. to assess the determinants of good economic performance), not all those
who employ these data are fully aware of the assumptions that go into their
construction, the complex trade-offs that inform these decisions, and their consequent
limitations, or of the implications that these limitations might have for the inferences
that are drawn. Users of these studies are in turn often even less aware of the
implications of these limitations for making inferences about alternative policy regimes.

24.

For instance, throughout the world, many economists are engaged in studying what
makes for successful growth. There are large numbers of empirical studies relating
economic outcomes to various policies. If the wrong metrics14 are employed, incorrect
inferences will be made. Many concluded, for instance, that financial deregulation was
good, because it led to rapid expansion of the financial industry and an increase in
measured GDP. We now know that that growth was not sustainable; that much of the
profits earned in 2004-2007 might more appropriately be looked at as winnings in
gambling by some, which were more than offset by the losses in 2008, and the
following years, by others. When looked at from a five-year perspective, the sector
earned zero or negative profits. Better metrics will not ensure that we always devise the
right policies or even that we make the right inferences, but they do make it less likely
that we will make the wrong inferences.

25.

The fact that the financial sector was growing so fast should have been a warning sign.
Financial services are, for an important part, a means to an end, not an end in
themselves. They are supposed to improve the economy’s ability to manage risk and
allocate capital, and in doing so, they increase its overall efficiency, capturing for
themselves a fraction of the gains. To a large extent, the benefits of the financial sector
should be reflected in the increased output of the economy, especially in the long run, as
better management of risk enables the economy to undertake higher risk while obtaining
a higher return on activities, and as the improved allocation of capital leads to increased
growth. The fact that a sector which largely provides intermediate goods was growing

14. Here as elsewhere in this overview we will encounter the same problem: it is not easy to disentangle what is due to the
imperfections in existing metrics and what is due to faulty analytical interpretations and/or misuses of existing metrics. This
problem is not surprising as we need a conceptual framework to build a measurement system. We hope that our Report will
contribute both to the construction of better metrics, which will lead to more reliance inferences, to greater attention to the
use of the appropriate metrics (within the set of existing and/or improved metrics), and to greater awareness of the
limitations of the metrics, and therefore of the inferences that can be drawn from studies based on their use.

11

REFLECTIONS AND OVERVIEW

so rapidly should be a cause of concern, unless our metrics show a more than
compensating improvement in the measures of economic performance that focus on
final output – on the goods and services that individuals actually enjoy.15 If intermediate
goods and services are taking up more and more of a society’s resources, it could be a
sign of increasing inefficiency (except if the country is selling those services to other
countries).
26.

In several countries, the issue of the measurement of economic performance and social
progress has become especially important, precisely because of the worry that standard
measures may encourage our societies to move in wrong directions. And as the present
crisis is telling us, moving in wrong directions can lead to social distress and a
deterioration in social welfare.

27.

Developing countries may be encouraged to allow a foreign mining company to develop
a mine, even though the country receives low royalties, even though the environment
may be degraded, and even though miners may be exposed to health hazards, because
by doing so GDP will be increased. But this Report emphasizes that GDP is not the only
measure on which the country should be focusing. It should focus also on the
sustainable well-being of the citizens of the country, and even though GDP may be
increased, better and/or alternative measures may show the mine as decreasing societal
well-being.

28.

Today, as we have noted, many countries face difficult choices as they begin to address
a range of environmental concerns. This will require changing not only modes of
production, but also patterns of living. There are high environmental costs associated
with suburban sprawl. There will have to be heavy investments in better-insulated
housing and more fuel-efficient cars. Some will complain that the economic costs are
too high and that as a consequence measured GDP may go down – but at least some of
those complaints are based on a measurement failure: our metrics do not accurately
reflect economic well-being, nor the fact that such expenditures may actually increase
well-being in the long run.

29.

This Report attempts to provide a more systematic account of the deficiencies in our
accounting systems and to suggest a research program that might address them. Most of
the examples given below have long been recognized by specialists in national income
accounting, but we thought it nonetheless useful to review them, partly because they
may not be well understood by many of those who make use of these metrics and/or of
studies based on them. Some of the anomalies in our current system are small and/or
technical, but others go to the heart of what we mean by “societal well-being”.

15. Some of the output of the financial services sector may be a final good in conventional accounting, e.g. that part that is sold
directly to individuals (rather than to firms.) Even then, of course, in measuring improvements in economic performance we
should be measuring, for instance, the savings in overall transactions costs (time and money). Several governments have
argued that revenues generated through certain fees may also reflect monopoly power; as we explain below, there are
difficulties in ascertaining how best to include such fees in our system of national accounts. Further problems may result
when there are persistent problems of consumer ignorance or producer misrepresentation. Assume that individuals are not
fully apprised of the fees that they pay on their credit cards. If they fully understood them, they would not have borrowed as
much on their credit card. The “exploitive” fees do not then really represent their valuation of the services provided by the
credit card company. Under current account, these fees are an addition to GDP. They might more accurately thought of as
simply a transfer payment from the household to the finance company. An increase in these exploitive fees does not
represent an improvement in economic performance; it is the contrary.

12

The Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress Revisited

I-2 On some complexities in the measurement of economic performances
30.

There is a long list of ways in which standard measures fail to capture important aspects
of societal well-being. A standard joke captures some of what is wrong with our
measures. Contrast the impact on GDP of two individuals. One is a happily married
woman (man) who goes home after work to her husband (his wife). Both may go home
after a working day. They get pleasure from cooking their gourmet meal together, using
ingredients which they have grown in their garden, and which they follow by a quiet
evening reading together. The net contribution to GDP is the value of the few
ingredients in their meal that they had to purchase and the cost of the books. By
contrast, the lonely bachelor eats an unhealthy meal at a fast food restaurant, then goes
to a bar where he drinks excessively as solace for his loneliness, visits a prostitute, and
then wrecks his car while driving back home, taking a taxi the remaining distance. This
unhappy individual has, by contrast, contributed greatly to GDP – the cost of
preparation and serving of the meal and drinks, the sexual services, the repair costs of
the automobile, and the taxi home all enter into GDP accounting16.

31.

An increase in violence in society decreases our sense of security. If we respond by
building more prisons, by hiring more bodyguards, by installing more surveillance
systems, GDP may go up. But no one would say society is better-off. Those who are
spending more to protect themselves against increased violence are suffering a loss of
welfare both because their purchasing power on other goods decreases and because they
feel insecure. This is an issue of considerable importance, as expenditures on prisons
(and security costs in general) have been rising rapidly.17 Who would pretend that
growth in the manufacturing and trade of private guns, mainly for self-defense reasons,
is contributing positively to GDP?18

32.

The US spends more on health care (as a percentage of its income and per capita) than
any other country. In 2008, health care expenditures represented more than 15% of US
GDP, compared to 11% in France. While the percentage of national income spent on
health has been increasing around the world, the gap between the US and France (and
most other countries) has been increasing, as shown in the following figure.

16. Of course this joke is willingly caricatural as its purpose is pedagogical. Sexual services are usually part of the underground
economy, as they are illegal. Homework falls disproportionately on women; and some of the more productive home
activities, like childcare, are not considered in the joke.
17. Between 1986 and 2001, State prison expenditures in constant dollars increased at an annual rate of 6.4% compared to 4.2%
for education. It is the highest rate of growth of all state expenditures. Cf. “Bureau of Justice Statistics, Special Report on
State Prison Expenditures, 2001”, June 2004, NCI 202949. http://www.ojp.usdoj.gov/bjs/pub/pdf/spe01.pdf.
18. This example illustrates a problem that we will discuss more extensively later: some might claim that the increased purchase
of guns has increased security from what it would have been otherwise, and in that sense, they are contributing to societal
well-being. From this perspective, it would be wrong to exclude them from our measurement of national output. But if the
reason for the increase in the purchase of guns is that there has been a general increase in violence, then the change in
societal well-being would have to take that into account. The increase in arms purchases will only partially offset the effect
of the increased insecurity. In that case, it might seem better not to include these purchases, at least for purposes of making
comparisons over time. Indeed, even excluding these purchases results in an overestimate of the improvement of societal
well-being, because it does not include any measure of the residual increase in insecurity.

13

REFLECTIONS AND OVERVIEW

Figure 1- Health Expenditures as % of GDP: France and the US
Health expenditures as % of GDP, France and the US
18,0
16,0
14,0
12,0
10,0

tats-Unis
France

8,0
6,0
4,0
2,0
0,0
1960

33.

1965

1970

1975

1980

1985

1990

1995

2000

2005

Yet health outcomes are lower in the United States, whether measured by infant
mortality, life expectancy at birth, or morbidity. The following figure compares for
males the evolution of life expectancy at birth between the two countries.
Figure 2-Life expectancy at birth (male): France and the US 1970-2007
Life expectancy at birth, USA/France, male, 1970-2007
80,0
78,0
76,0
74,0

USA
France

72,0
70,0
68,0

34.

14

06
20

00

03
20

20

97
19

91

94
19

19

85

82

88
19

19

19

76

79
19

19

73
19

19

70

66,0

.

We are supposed to be looking for performance (output) measures, and yet traditionally,
in standard national income accounts, we use as our performance measure a measure of
input (amount spent providing the service). If the US health care system becomes less
efficient (as some believe is the case), then inputs go up, and GDP increases. Our
performance measure should be penalizing the US, and yet it seems to be rewarding it.
It is true that constructing output measures is not that easy, but it is not an excuse for
overlooking the problem. EU Member States were required to adopt direct output
measures under the European Commission decision of 2002. There has been extensive

The Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress Revisited

analysis of productivity changes in the health care sector a number of countries. In the
UK, the Office for National Statistics has been investigating measures of health gain to
give a quality adjustment to health care output. But the results of all these attempts are
still in their infancy, and much work is required if we want to be confident in making
international comparisons.
35.

The same problem arises in making comparisons of GDP across countries, say
comparing US and French GDP. Part of the explanation of America’s higher GDP per
capita is that it spends more on health. If the US and France had the same health
outcomes, then one might argue that health sector “activity” appropriately measured
should be the same. If we make that adjustment alone, the difference between US and
France’s per capita GDP is reduced by about one-third.

36.

As always, matters are more complicated. Perhaps Americans are naturally less healthy,
and therefore it takes more “market activity” to produce the same health outcomes. Our
statistics should reflect the “value added” of the economy. If Americans were naturally
less healthy than the French, and yet because of more spending on health, Americans
succeed in achieving comparable health outcomes, then we should credit the health care
system with this achievement: this is its “value added”. For example, life expectancy at
high ages in the US is one of the highest in the world. But it may not be easy to identify
what changes are consequences of the way the economy functions. America is faced
with an epidemic of obesity. Some critics blame America’s fast food economy and firms
that push addictive foods, even on children. Others look towards other societal forces.
If one attributes the obesity to economic forces, then additional economic activity in the
health care sector directed at correcting the problems created by the distorted market are
simply undoing the damage that the malfunctioning economy creates; it would be
wrong to include these expenditures as part of our measure of how market activity
contributes to an increase in our well-being. But if the origins of growing obesity lie
elsewhere, then we should recognize these economic expenditures as part of our
measure of economic activity, noting that they are making us better-off than we
otherwise would be.

37.

An analogy may be helpful. Assume that for some perverse reason an economy hires
people to randomly knock down buildings, and then hires people to reconstruct them. A
new President gets elected in the country, and he expands economic activity by hiring
more people to knock down more buildings, and then hires more people to reconstruct
them. In the standard measure, GDP has gone up (twice – because of the additional
activity in both destruction and reconstruction). Yet no one would claim that in normal
time well-being has increased. (This would not be true in effect if the policy was
implemented during a recession and generated more income through multiplier effects.)
In this particular example, there is an alternative metric that would provide a far better
picture of economic performance: Net Domestic Product (NDP) (rather than Gross
Domestic Product) would take into account the destruction of capital. The example
shows that the pervasive use of GDP for measuring economic performance may lead us
to wrong inferences; in this case, the problem could easily be corrected, by shifting to
an alternative metric. But in some of the other instances we discuss in this Report, there
is no easy solution.

38.

Consider the problems posed by the surburbanization process underway in many
countries. As a result of increases in commuting, GDP increases because of greater

15

REFLECTIONS AND OVERVIEW

spending on transportation. If the country fails to provide adequate public
transportation, there will be greater use of private means of transport, and an increase in
traffic jams and thus higher oil consumption, all contributing to increased GDP. But the
well-being of society is clearly lower. People literally lose time (commuting time is not
leisure, nor, like work, does it yield a direct return) and pollution increases.
39.

If the road infrastructure is in bad shape, GDP may increase still more, as a result of a
further increase in the number of car accidents, with the resulting increase in the
turnover of the automobile repair sector and in medical expenditures. What should be
treated as a bad – a deficiency in the provision of a public good – will be accounted as a
good – an increase in GDP. Again, better accounting systems that take account of the
destruction of physical and human capital would avoid these faulty inferences, but it is
hard to make the necessary adjustments, and in practice none of the metrics in use do so
fully.

40.

The worry is that some of the increases in economic activity that have been observed in
many countries are analogous, though in much less transparent ways.

II. Accounting for the changing structure of our economy
41.

There have been large changes in the structure of our societies, which mean that even if
the measures which were used 50 years ago did a good job of reflecting economic
performance then¸ they may not do as good a job now. These changes in the structure of
society – and differences across countries – mean that we need to be careful in making
comparisons over long periods of time. By the same token, differences in the structures
of different economies make comparisons across countries difficult. In addition, there
have been changes in societal values. Even if environmental degradation and resource
depletion were as important a half century ago as they were today, there was less
recognition of these problems, and therefore less recognition of their import for the
measurement of economic performance or societal well-being. While most of the
problems to which we call attention in the following paragraphs have long been
recognized, these changes in our economy and our society have given them heightened
importance.

II-1 The growing role of imputations
42.

16

The step rise in public expenditures after the Second World War and the concomitant
expansion of government have in many countries represented a structural change.

The Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress Revisited

Table 1: Total government expenditure as %GDP
United States
United Kingdom
France
Germany

43.

1950
21,4
34,2
27,6
30,4

1970
32,1
42
37
40,5

2008
38,6
47,6
52,7
44,0

But GDP is constructed by adding up the market value of goods and services produced
in the economy. We add up the apples and oranges and other products produced in the
economy using market prices, because market prices are assumed to reflect individual’s
(marginal) valuations of these different commodities. But for a large, and increasing,
fraction of the goods and services produced in the economy, the conditions under which
such an assumption is true are not likely to be satisfied. This is particularly true for the
goods and services produced by government to households on a free basis (mainly
health and education). Besides, more and more people live in their own homes.
Because they are not paying rent, we don’t have a measure of the value of the current
housing services.19 We estimate these “imputed rents” (economists refer to these as
imputations; others might call these educated guesses). Table 2 shows that in 2007 these
two elements alone – imputed housing, and publicly provided goods and services –
constituted 18.4 % of household income in the USA, up from 16.7 % in 1985. In France
and Finland, the same imputations are around 30 %.
Table 2: Impact of imputations on household disposable income
% of income

Imputed rents
Social transfers in
kind
Total

USA

France

Finland

1985
8.8%

2007
10.1%

1985
6.9%

2007
10.1%

1985
9.2%

2007
12.2%

7.9%
16.7%

8.3%
18.4%

17.3%
24.2%

19%
29.1%

19.5%
28.7%

22.3%
34.5%

Source: OECD National Accounts.

44.

But the problems do not stop here. If we include housing services provided within the
normal household, why not other services that are also not mediated by markets? In
Chapter 1 of the main Report, we estimate these services to be between 30% and 40% of
conventionally measured GDP. If we include these, then the fraction of our metric
which is based on “imputations” rises to about 60%.

45.

This illustrates a central problem in constructing metrics: the more comprehensive we
attempt to make the metric, the less meaningful may it become, in the sense that more of
the numbers are based on imputations.

46.

It means, of course, that we need to think very carefully about the purposes for which
we are using the metric. One of the reasons that GDP measures were originally devised,

19. Somebody living in his own home might enjoy the same housing services year after year, but the market value of those
housing services might vary a great deal, reflecting changes in rental markets. Still, in spite of this, there is no change in the
individual’s standard of living. Well designed statistical systems should reflect this.

17

REFLECTIONS AND OVERVIEW

as we noted above (par. 10), was to measure the level of market economic activity, the
goods and services produced in the market. This is a rather narrow objective, and even
here, there are problems, as we have noted.
47.

There are three sets of often interrelated problems: (a) conceptual problems of what
should be included; (b) measurement problems of what is included; and (c) valuation
problems of what is included. Sometimes we can measure inputs, but not outputs.
Sometimes we can observe outputs, but are not sure how to value them. The biases are
often complex: sometimes they lead to an underestimate, sometimes to an overestimate.

Intermediate goods
48.

In the following paragraphs, we describe some of the controversies over what should be
included in our metrics.

49.

We explained earlier that we should not include intermediate goods and services (like
financial services), but only final goods and services, to avoid double counting.
Intermediate goods are in effect already included in the value of final goods and
services. But it is not always possible to ascertain what is final and what is intermediate.
Transportation services sometimes are part of consumption, but commuting to work is
best thought as part of work, a necessary cost to earning income. Typically, we cannot
even measure “transportation services”. Rather, we estimate the input of oil and cars
used in transport. A more fuel-efficient car will enable the same transportation services
to be provided with less input of oil. Unless we correctly account for the improvement
in the quality of the car, it might appear as if economic activity is lowered as a result of
less input of oil.

Defensive expenditures
50.

Individuals are risk averse, and thus value security. Insurance companies provide
insurance that reduces insecurity, but many other aspects of economic activity are
directed at managing risk. Firms facing the threat of an interruption of supplies may
keep greater inventories. Firms facing higher price volatility may lay off some of that
risk through trading in futures markets. But changes in economic policy may affect the
level of risk, and therefore the need for engaging in these risk-reducing activities. For
instance, some argue that financial and capital market liberalization has resulted in
greater risk and volatility. If so, it would be misleading to say that the economic activity
induced to layoff the risk was an increase in economic well-being. This is an example of
a category of expenditures called defensive expenditures, which may in fact constitute
an important part of standard measurement of GDP. Here, as elsewhere, the problem is
that we don’t have a good way of measuring the output in which we are really
interested, individuals’ sense of security. Again, in our metrics of performance (output)
we include expenditures directed at reducing insecurity, but we recognize that the way
the economy is designed may, in fact, indirectly give rise to the needs that these
expenditures are intended to address. (The similarity between this problem and that of
obesity, discussed earlier, should be clear.)

51.

The problem in making comparisons over time is that the structure of the economy may
change in ways that increase (or decrease) the importance of these measurement

18

The Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress Revisited

problems. Social disintegration may lead to an increased importance of defensive
expenditures. Vertical disintegration of production may make the problems posed by
intermediate goods more complex to resolve in order to avoid double counting.

II-2 How structural changes may bias our measure of performance
52.

A few principles guide our thinking. We wish to avoid obvious distortions and biases.
Changes in the economic structure – including in the way certain economic activities
are conducted – may result in systematic overestimates or underestimates.

a. Biases against home production
53.

For instance, our measure of performance should not increase simply because some
activity switches from home production to market production or from public production
to private production. Recent decades have seen marked shifts from home to market
production20; and typically, in developed countries, market production is more
important than in developing countries. For instance, people go out to restaurants more
often, eating at home less frequently. Even at home, they are more likely to use prepared
meals, and when they do not buy a prepared meal, they are less likely to use vegetables
grown in their own garden. Few in Europe or America make their own clothes. In
traditional extended families, the grandmother babysits; increasingly in the modern
family, such services are bought in the market. Fortunately, most national statistical
offices now conduct time-use surveys, and we now have relatively good information on
inputs of hours into non-market work.21

54.

This means a measure focusing on market production is likely to overstate increases in
well-being: some of the measured increase is simply a shift in the locus of production.
Indeed, many might argue that no McDonald’s meal could come close to being a real
substitute for Grandma’s cooking.

55.

Fortunately, such changes occur gradually over time and for that reason will not cause
abrupt changes in measured GDP. If, on the contrary, we see that market output has
fallen by 5% between this year and last, it means something significant has happened to
the performance of the economy. To be sure, there will be more “leisure” and, of
necessity, with budgets cut, more home production of meals. Yet, it says something
significant to state that market production has fallen dramatically. There are good
reasons that measures of market activity play such an important role in our
measurement of economic performance. In particular, in a recession individual
recourse to “non-market” production is not voluntary – it is the result of individuals not
being able to find work – so there is typically a large loss of well-being. There is a

20. It might be worth noting that this shift – in the US at least – results from the reallocation of women’s time to market work.
Men have actually gone the opposite way, devoting more time to home production and reducing their participation in paid
employment (although not nearly enough to counterbalance changes in women’s time allocation).
21. But while we have measures of time allocation, three problems remain: (a) Some of the time devoted to cooking may be
more a form of leisure. (This problem arises, too, in a somewhat different form, in market production; individuals may
enjoy market work just as they enjoy non-market work. In principle, to the extent that that is the case systematically in some
job, the wage for that job would adjust to reflect these non-pecuniary benefits.) (b) There are difficulties of valuing the time
allocated to home production. (See the discussion below). (c) There are difficulties in assessing productivity
improvements. We are interested in measures of output; we are attempting to infer output from inputs.

19

REFLECTIONS AND OVERVIEW

failure of the economy to work in the way that it should. It is important to have
diagnostics that tell us of the magnitude of this “disease”, and much of traditional
national income accounting is directed at this objective.
56.

While it is desirable to go beyond market production, assessing the value of home
production poses real difficulties. As difficult as matters are in the public sector (to be
discussed shortly), matters are even worse in assessing non-market economic activities.
We have difficulty measuring and valuing inputs, not just in measuring and valuing
outputs. We know that there have been marked changes in home production – automatic
washing machines, dishwashers, dryers, and vacuum cleaners are technological
revolutions no less important than mechanization within the market. Some of the value
of these inputs is “captured” in the value of market sales, particularly when appropriate
adjustments are made for the improvement of these household durables. Still, as the
discussion below illustrates, significant problems of quantification of these changes
remain.

57.

Extended families in many countries provide their members “insurance” services.
Everybody helps out when someone is in trouble. In some countries, these insurance
services are moved into the market, in others they have been shifted to the government.
While the “risk” services may be similar, how they are evaluated in the national income
accounts may differ markedly.

b. Depreciation and technical progress
58.

There have been several other long-run changes in the structure of our economy. Again,
taking account of these is not so important when our focus is on the level of market
activity (or changes in those levels over a short time-span) rather than on the level of
societal well-being. One such change involves depreciation. We need to take account of
the depreciation of our capital stock, just as we need to take into account the depletion
of our natural resources.22 Otherwise we would overstate the material dimension of our
well-being. In a manufacturing economy, depreciation may be largely a matter of
machines wearing out. In a modern innovation economy, depreciation is largely a matter
of technological obsolescence – which in turn depends on a hard-to-predict variable, the
pace of innovation. In the “old” economy, the ratio of NDP (net output, taking account
of depreciation) to GDP (gross output, ignoring depreciation) may be high and stable. In
the “new” economy, the ratio is probably much lower and certainly much more variable.
If this is indeed the case, it means that NDP (and thus a more relevant measure of wellbeing) has increased more slowly than GDP. More of gross output is spent just replacing
equipment that has become obsolete.

c. Imperfections in competition and the New Economy
59.

Among the sources of growth in both developed and developing countries have been
sectors, like telecommunications and airlines, in which firms can engage in price
discrimination. Different individuals may face different prices, and significant quantity

22. These issues are closely linked to those discussed later on sustainability. If we do not invest to offset the depreciation of a
machine producing today’s output, that output (and the consumption which is based on it) can’t be sustained. When we add
to consumption the gross investment that we are making today, we get an exaggerated view of today’s “output.”

20

The Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress Revisited

discounts or surcharges may exist. Prices are used to value output, but only because they
represent how individuals, at the margin, value one good against another. This no longer
holds when there is price discrimination and profits no longer measure the (marginal)
valuations of the output less the (marginal) valuations of the inputs. If market
imperfections grow, then changes in the price of, say, telecommunications services no
longer accurately reflect changes in marginal valuations. Growth may be overstated.

d. Other market failures
60.

Markets fail for a variety of reasons – imperfections of competition discussed in the
previous paragraph, externalities such as pollution, incomplete risk markets, or
involuntary unemployment. The importance of these market failures can change over
time, in some cases markedly so. Urbanization has increased the importance of urban
amenities. Waste disposal may not be a problem in sparsely populated rural sectors, but
becomes critical in urban areas. We must spend money to get what was once obtained at
no cost. In some ways, this is like the switch from non-market activity to market
activity; it is a switch from “free” to “purchased”.23

e. Globalization
61.

Globalization is one of the other important forces facing our society, and it too poses
challenges to our measurement system. As we have noted, the incomes of a country’s
citizens may differ markedly from the output produced within the country – in capitalexporting countries, it may be much larger, in capital-importing countries much smaller.
Not taking into account capital flows may provide a vastly distorted picture; and
because capital flows can change quickly in a short period of time, this is an arena in
which change poses difficulty both for long-run and short-run comparisons. This
implies that the relevant measure (at least for the assessment of the welfare of the
citizens in the country) in a globalized world is the Gross National Product (GNP), and
the refinements to that concept presented in Chapter 1. These measures include net
income received from or paid abroad -- rather than the GDP which does not, yet it is the
latter concept that is typically used today. For purposes of the welfare of the citizens of
a country, what matters is not what is produced within the country, but the incomes of
the citizens of the country.24

f. The growth of government
62.

Another major change in many economies is the increasing role of government. Again,
we would get a distorted view of the world if output were to increase or decrease simply
because some activity shifts from private to public production. In principle, it should not
change. But in the public sector, we measure output by input. Thus, a shift from the
private to the public sector in which nothing else changes almost necessarily lowers

23. With some market failures, prices may still reflect individual’s marginal valuations. It is only that the market prices are not
those that would prevail were these market failures corrected. Often, however, there are impacts on the well-being of others
(this is the case with externalities) that are not captured in market prices; and in many cases there are adverse effects on
natural assets, which should be taken into account in any system of national accounts. See below.
24. Obviously, migration, and especially temporary migration, presents further complexities, which we do not address here.

21

REFLECTIONS AND OVERVIEW

GDP. It lowers it even more if the shift enhances efficiency, because then the input is
lowered – and measured GDP falls.
63.

While this suggests a statistical bias against public provision, matters are more
complicated. It is possible that the value of the goods and services provided by the
government is less than the value of the inputs. In that case, valuing public goods and
services at the cost of inputs overstates the value of what is produced.

g. Leisure
64.

Still another change in economic structure involves leisure: there are marked changes in
the amount of leisure enjoyed over time and amongst countries – and even within
countries (a point that we will return to shortly). We have witnessed enormous increases
in productivity in the last 150 years. Many economists had expected that most
individuals would respond by increasing the amount of both the leisure and the goods
that they enjoy. Yet in the United States, on average, Americans have responded in the
two last decades by working more and increasing their consumption of marketproduced goods and services – in marked contrast to what has happened in many other
countries. The table below shows that for the last year available the working time of the
American is the highest among the countries considered.
Figure 3- Housework, paid work and leisure
Minutes per day and person, latest year available*

Note. Using normalised series for personal care; Unites States: 2005, Finland 1998, France 1999,
Germany 2002, Italy 2003, United Kingdom 2001.
Source: OECD (2008), Growing Unequal? Income Distribution and Poverty in OECD Countries, Paris.

65.

22

America’s response raises many questions: clearly, our planet could not sustain such
consumption levels were they to be extended everywhere, without marked increases in
“environmental efficiency”, for instance, a reduction in the level of emissions per unit
of output. But here again, our focus is narrower: We ask only, what do these differences

The Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress Revisited

imply for evaluating economic performance? Surely, if one society chooses to limit its
consumption of material goods, enjoying more leisure, including time devoted to
culture, the arts, and community engagement, it should not be counted against it.
Citizens in such a society might be far happier than in one which works longer hours,
spending less time both with the family and in the community. Citizens in the hardworking society complain that, while they are working hard for the family, they have no
time left for the family. Yet, our conventional measures would attribute better economic
performance to the harder- working and unhappier society: both incomes and growth
would be higher. Furthermore, the increase in average working time may be itself the
consequence of the society’s malfunctioning. If inequality becomes pervasive, the
number of persons who have to work harder to ensure their living may greatly increase
(there is a negatively sloped Hicksian labour supply curve): they may claim that they
have no choice but to work harder (though of course they could, were they willing to
accept a much lower standard of material consumption than other citizens). It would be
questionable whether this evolution is welfare-enhancing, even if GDP increases as a
consequence.
66.

One needs to look at these issues, of course, from a lifetime perspective, and from this
perspective, the discrepancies across societies and over time may be even larger. For
instance, in some societies, individuals retire earlier than in others. Mobility may
change over time and differ across countries; in countries with lower mobility, for a
given level of contemporaneous inequality, lifetime inequalities will be greater. Poorer
individuals often have to retire earlier, because of the back-breaking work in which they
are engaged; thus their lifetime earnings may be an even smaller fraction of mean
lifetime income than their current income is of current mean income.

67.

The retirement decision illustrates the complexity of measuring performance. Many
individuals would prefer to work more years if their work were interesting25; work is an
important part of their self-identity. Standard economic models view work as a cost, yet
for many individuals, meaningful and decent work gives some sense to life. In some
countries, there are important changes to the nature of the workplace. More democratic
workplaces can make work more interesting and rewarding. Standard metrics take no
account of these changes. The extensions of our systems of metrics discussed in Chapter
2 of the main Report hold the promise of being able to do this.

68.

By the same token, individuals spend longer in school today than they used to. Some of
this education is “consumption”, but some is “investment”. The former might
appropriately be included in “leisure”, the latter as an intermediate good, an input into
the production of other goods and services.

h. Distribution
69.

A final important change in the structure of many societies around the world is
increasing inequality. The distribution of income and wealth determines who enjoys
access to the goods and services produced within a society. (It also has import for

25. There is no contradiction here with the preceding paragraphs. Individuals may at the same time value leisure during their
professional life and because the latter is rewarding still prefer to retire at an older age.

23

REFLECTIONS AND OVERVIEW

influence in political processes.) Earlier, we noted that one of the reasons that changes
in GDP per capita over time (and differences across countries) often fail to reflect
widespread perceptions of such changes (or differences) is that the benefits of growth
are not just unequally distributed, but may be becoming more so: most of society can be
worse-off, even as a few are so much better-off that average incomes have increased.
70.

One of the reasons that most people may perceive themselves as being worse-off even
though average GDP is increasing is because they are indeed worse-off. This has been
the case, for instance, in the United States in recent years: in 2006, median household
income (that is, the income of the household such that half of the households had
incomes greater than that amount, half less) was lower than in 1998, even though GDP
per capita had increased by about 9% over that period. If we take a longer perspective,
over the last 40 years median household income has increased by only 30%, while GDP
per capita has doubled.

71.

While there is no single number that summarizes the manifold distributional changes (or
differences across countries), what is clear is that average income does not provide an
adequate summary statistic. If societies care about inequality, then a policy that
simultaneously increased national income and inequality could either increase or
decrease societal welfare. By the same token, if average income is increasing but at the
same time inequality is increasing, it is not clear whether societal well-being is
increasing or decreasing. And inequality may increase in a variety of ways, as it is a
multidimensional concept. The relevant question is: “inequality of what?”26 . If for
example, the way chosen to increase production and income, is labour cost reduction
through a decrease, say, in health insurance, average income may well go up (because
competitvity is enhanced), but the capabilities of some fraction of the population, their
freedom to choose their life will almost surely go down.

72.

There are many elements of the distribution of income that constitute part of the picture
of what is happening to a society. In societies in which incomes are growing rapidly,
elderly people may have a much lower income than younger people, unless societies
have a good social security system – beyond that which can be provided by private
savings. As we noted earlier, societies with greater social and economic mobility may
have less inequality in lifetime incomes than other societies with comparable measured
inequalities at a moment of time.

73.

What matters is thus not just inequality of income or consumption, but inequalities in
the opportunities, capacities, and life chances of those born under different
circumstances. The capability approach to the quality of life emphasizes the objective
determinants of well-being, without reducing it to those determinants. If the capabilities
of different individuals – such as having adequate nourishment or the literacy required
to participate actively in political life – become more unequal, social mobility will be
impaired27. The question then is why, to start with, capabilities became more unequal
and the answer can’t be but that the provision of public goods and services has
deteriorated. There is, in effect, considerable concern that in some societies there has

26. Cf. Amartya Sen: “Equality of What?”, in S. McMurrin (ed), Tanner Lectures on Human Values, vol I (Cambridge:
Cambridge University Press and Salt Lake City, UT: University of Utah Press, 1980)
27. Cf Amartya Sen (op. cit.) and by the same author: commodities and capabilities, Oxford: Oxford University Press, 1999

24

The Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress Revisited

been deterioration in broader measures of socio-economic mobility, though in others it
has improved. Policies (such as the quality and inclusivity of public education) may
improve these broader measures of socio-economic mobility. This is an arena where the
failure to gather relevant data may have led to the pursuit of policies with adverse
societal consequences.
74.

“In noting the nature of Human lives, we have reason to be interested not only in the
various things we succeed in doing, but also in the freedoms that we actually have to
choose between different kinds of live”28. This is the philosophical underpinning to the
capability approach to measuring the quality of life. It is why this approach, which we
describe extensively in Chapter 2 of the main report, argues that the quality of life
should be conceived and measured directly in terms of functionings – i.e. beings and
doings that people value and have reason to value – and capabilities instead of resources
or utility. “Even though the much used economic criteria of advancement, reflected in a
mass of readily produced statistics, have tended to focus specifically on the
enhancement of inanimate objects of convenience (for example in the GNP or GDP
which have been the focus of a myriad of economic studies of progress), that
concentration could be ultimately justified – to the extent it could be – only through
what these objects do to the human lives they can directly or indirectly influence”29.
Focusing on outcome is in effect very limitative, because capability captures not only
achievement, but also unchosen alternatives. If a person chooses to work fewer hours to
enjoy more leisure, this implies that he had the opportunity to work longer hours. If the
cost of unemployment for an unemployed person is much higher than the lost in
income, it is likely because it includes a lost alternative.

75.

Measurement problems – of the kind addressed in this Report – bedevil our attempt to
ascertain what is happening to the distribution of income. We can describe, for instance,
how money (or nominal) income for different groups is changing. But that does not tell
the whole story. The elderly may consume more medical services, so that if there is a
higher rate of inflation in medical services, their real income should be adjusted to
reflect this. To achieve the same functioning as the younger, they need a higher income,
a characteristic that the capability approach emphasizes. The government may, for that
reason, provide more medical services for the elderly without charge or at discounted
prices. Our statistics may or may not trace who receives various publicly provided
services. We noted earlier that development is often associated with urbanization. But
prices of goods and services in the rural area may differ from those in the urban area,
and the rate of increase of prices may also differ.30 Recent years have seen prices of
housing in urban areas increase markedly relative to rural areas. One of the
controversies over the extent of poverty concerns the prices that urban dwellers have to
pay for the goods they consume. Locally produced food and housing may be much less
expensive, but imported goods may be more expensive. The poor may buy many key
goods in small quantities, which drives up their cost of living. Adjustments in
“purchasing power parity” numbers in recent years have provided markedly different
pictures both of the level of poverty around the world and the magnitude of poverty

28. Amartya Sen: The idea of Justice, Allen Lane, 2009, P.18
29. Amartya Sen, Op. Cit.
30. These remarks highlight the risks of using a single consumer price index to adjust nominal incomes for different groups.

25

REFLECTIONS AND OVERVIEW

reduction. The number of persons in absolute poverty (less than 1 dollar per day) has
decreased from about 1.5 billion in 1981 to less than 1 billion in 2004. But if the
absolute poverty line is increased to 2 dollars per day, this number has slightly increased
during the same period: from 2.4 billion in 1981 to 2.5 billion in 200431.
76.

Unfortunately, in many areas, even when we have the appropriate conceptual
frameworks, there are problems in getting relevant data. Many inequalities, including
those related to gender (both in terms of consumption and household work), occur
within the household, and therefore are masked by “household” data. There are
problems in reconciling data generated by household surveys used in assessing income
and consumption inequalities with those underlying national income accounts. Our
Report emphasizes the need for greater investments in data.

i. Change in household size
77.

There have been many significant demographic changes in recent years that affect the
measurement and interpretation of the data on economic performance and societal wellbeing. Here we emphasize family size. Most individuals live within households, and
household sizes have been changing. Most households today are smaller than they
previously were. Adjustments are often made to reflect economies of scale in household
living. If the average size of households goes down, then, using these household
adjustments, well-being will increase less than proportionately to the increase in
unadjusted household income. But this conventional approach misses one important
point: individuals, for the most part, have chosen to live in smaller households. There
are perceived benefits: perhaps fewer “free rider” problems, perhaps fewer coordination
problems, or perhaps some people value greatly the increased “space” that it provides.
The fact that they could have chosen to live in larger family units suggests that these
benefits outweigh the more narrowly defined economic disadvantages.

78.

The move to more nuclear families has other consequences. More extended families
provide a variety of services (babysitting, cooking) and additional security, which
typically are not reflected in our performance measurements.

j. Changes in the pace of change
79.

Changes are always occurring, and will always occur. But there have been changes in
the pace of change, and these may have a qualitative as well as a quantitative effect.
They make the task of assessing change more difficult. They throw into question longterm comparisons. Some have suggested, for instance, that the magnitude of economic
fluctuations in the post-Keynesian world is little different than earlier32. But even if the
statistical analysis of the data is correct, it may be little more than a statistical artifact, a
measurement error. We know, for instance, using other metrics, that there is a
difference: since the advent of Keynes the length of economic expansions has been
longer, of downturns shorter. But with the quickening pace of innovation (if our metrics

31. Cf. Francisco H.G. Ferreira and Martin Ravallion, “Global Poverty and Inequality: A Review of the Evidence”, Policy
Research Working paper no. 4623, The World Bank, May 2008.
32. Cf. Christina Romer: “The Prewar Business Cycle Reconsidered; New Estimates on Gross National Product, 1869-1908”,
The Journal of Political Economy, Vol.97 n°1 February 1989.

26

The Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress Revisited

on the pace of innovation are correct), there may be problems making comparisons over
even shorter periods of time.

Some concluding observations
80.

We have listed several important changes in the structure of economies throughout the
world. These and other important changes in economic structure pose large numbers of
policy challenges. Our concern in this Report is narrower: we are concerned with
assessing economic performance and social progress. It may be relatively easy to
compare two economies with similar structures. It is far more difficult to make
comparisons involving economies with different structures. Since economic structures
normally change slowly, these differences in structure may not be that important in
assessing the change over a decade. But they take on central importance in assessing
changes over longer periods of time, or in making comparisons, even among advanced
industrial countries, where, say, one country has chosen to rely more on government
provision of certain social services and the other has turned to private provision.

81.

The discussion in the following chapters will show the valiant efforts national income
statisticians are making to deal with these intractable problems. Yet, it will also show
the limitations of these statistics. One of the important lessons to emerge from this
Report is the need for caution: one has to be aware of these limitations as one attempts
to make judgments, whether about the effectiveness of certain policies, or the
magnitudes of progress over time, or differences across countries.

III. The way we proceed
82.

Because what we measure affects what we do, the construction of measures of
economic performance has become the subject of some political controversy. Not
surprisingly, some in the mining industry resisted early efforts to construct measures of
“green GDP”, which took into account the effects of mining on resource depletion and
environmental degradation.

83.

This is a Report of technical experts. But as technical experts, we realize that a society’s
values are inevitably embedded in the construction of an index of economic
performance and social progress. We have attempted to discuss the construction of
indices reflecting the valuations, capabilities, and perceptions of individual members of
society. Individuals and households are the basic units of analysis. Yet their perceptions
too must be seen within a social context.

84.

It is our belief that an open discussion of the issues – and problems – involved in
measuring economic performance and social progress provides an important context
within which societies can engage in critical debates about societal values. Given the
diversity of views within our society, it is not surprising that we have not put forward a
single “best” or “correct” way of measuring economic performance and social progress.
There are many indicators of societal well-being. But we strive to go beyond simply

27

REFLECTIONS AND OVERVIEW

listing a set of factors that affect individual and societal well-being. Part of our objective
is to find quantitative metrics for key factors, and to assess the relative importance of
various factors and to discuss the methodologies by which such quantitative
assessments may be made.
85.

Consider, for instance, health – clearly an important determinant of individual and
societal well-being. There have been marked improvements in health status in most
countries around the world. Life expectancy of men in France has increased from 68
years to 77 years over the period 1970 to 2006, and in the US from 67 years to 75 years
over the same period.

86.

These improvements are an important aspect of societal progress in recent decades. We
should make note of these improvements, even if we cannot be sure what causes them,
and even if were are not sure of the best way of quantifying them. The changes in
complex: there have been large changes in the quality of medicine, and in social mores
that affect health status. Changes in the environment or chemicals that are added to
food may have mixed effects on health status. But when changes in health status are
directly related to economic activity, it would be wrong not to include them somehow in
our measurement of economic performance.

87.

But how do we add up improvements in health status with changes in material wellbeing or increases in leisure? Again, there are standard techniques – how much
individuals value an additional year of life, or reductions in the risk of certain
disabilities. Yet these techniques do not command the assent of many economists and
social scientists, let alone support from other segments of society, for whom life may be
viewed as priceless. We cannot resolve these matters here; but they suggest that, until
there is broader societal consensus, it would be best to present such indicators
separately.

88.

This approach has sometimes been referred to as constructing a “dashboard” of
indicators. As is so often the case, there are trade-offs: a single metric is easier to
understand, and yet one cannot expect to summarize all the relevant information
concerning the performance of something as complex as our society within a single
indicator.

89.

But while we believe that there should be an array of carefully chosen statistics
(illustrated by the discussions of this Report), we believe that the construction of some
simple “aggregate” measures, along the lines of traditional GDP measures, can be
extremely useful. There is a need for an “extended” or “adjusted” GDP-like measure.

90.

This Report progresses through a succession of revisions and extensions of the standard
measures. Each of the revisions is important, in its own way, both for assessing changes
in well-being and making comparisons across countries.

91.

Chapter I of the main Report begins with a review of several long-discussed
adjustments. The need for most of the adjustments discussed in Part I is widely
recognized, and yet, ironically, some of the reforms of recent years have moved in the
opposite direction. In particular, while GDP measures output within a country, much
more relevant for assessing the well-being of a country’s citizens is the income of those
within the country, which was more closely captured by the GNP numbers that were
more widely used prior to 1990. In our report, we discuss refinements to this concept (in

28

The Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress Revisited

particular, Net Domestic Disposal Income, NDDI). The differences have become
particularly important in an era of globalization, with large flows of money going from
one country to another.
92.

The first set of reforms focuses on better measures of market income and output –
taking into account, for instance, depletion of natural resources, degradation of the
environment (issues which are also central to the discussion of Part III), and better
measurement of health, education, and other services provided by the government. The
failure to take into account resource depletion means that many countries overestimate
their true output – and the failure to take into account environmental degradation almost
surely means that the world as a whole is overestimating global income.

93.

We proceed from there to look for better measures of individual and societal welfare,
taking into account most importantly, recent innovations in assessing well-being.

94.

The current crisis, and the climatic crisis associated with global warming, has drawn our
attention to the importance of sustainability – any measure of economic performance
(whether it is a measure of output or income or a broader measure of well-being) has to
address not just what is happening today, but the consequences of today’s actions on the
future. The final part of this Report describes the progress that has been made in
constructing the appropriate metrics that rise to this challenge.

95.

There are accordingly three Chapters to the Report (both in their technical and nontechnical versions): The first focuses on improvements in the measurement of output
and income (what we refer to as the classical GDP issues). The second on broader
measures of well-being; the third on measuring sustainability. Our Report progresses
from the easiest to measure to the more difficult, from the areas in which there is broad
consensus to those in which there is less consensus. Sections IV through VI deal with
these issues. But we are more concerned with well-being than activity. Sections VII
will consider other approaches to monitoring societal progress. Finally, in Section VIII
we discuss the problems of sustainability.

IV. Measuring the level of market activity and government services
96.

We have begun with the challenges posed by measuring the level of market activity,
proceeding from there to the measurement of overall activity. Sections V and VI
consider adjustments to our measurement of market activity that provide a better
assessment of well-being (leisure, defensive expenditures, etc.). In a sense, these
sections can be thought of as attempts within the classical framework of doing a better
job of assessing changes in welfare.

97.

One would have thought that there are few problems in measuring market activity. All
one has to do is add up the market value of goods and services produced, then construct
some measure of inflation to convert nominal values into real values, and one will have
a good measure of real national income. As the discussion above should have suggested,

29

REFLECTIONS AND OVERVIEW

matters are more complicated. Here we highlight a few of the key points that are
elaborated at much greater length in the Report.
98.

Several of these are related to the fact that, as we have already noted, much of what we
call market activity is only partially so. The government buys its inputs (labour, other
goods and services) in the market, but most of what it delivers is not sold, and even
when it sells certain goods and services, it does not do so in a competitive marketplace.
While the discussion below focuses on problems with assessing the value of
government output, there are problems in other sectors as well. In many countries, most
citizens do not buy housing services, but rather own their own home. While they have
purchased their home in the market, there is no market price for the housing services
they have obtained this year.33

Measuring the value of the output of marketed goods and services: quality
99.

Much of the increase in GDP today occurs not as a result of, say, an increase in the
number of cars purchased, but of improvements in their quality. They pollute the air
less, they are safer, they get more miles per gallon, and they may even be more
comfortable. The challenge then is to figure out, when the price of a car increases, how
much of the increase represents an increase in “quality” and how much inflation. The
difficulty is compounded when we deal with services. Whereas for manufactures it is
easy to define the unit purchased, this is much harder for many services. This difficulty
has long been recognized, and it implies that for the service sector, especially for
complex services, the quality question will be much harder to resolve. There are
standard techniques – hedonic prices, by which statisticians determine how much
individuals are willing to pay for a specific dimension of quality, for instance, an
increase in miles per gallon.

100. But this refers to private, not social valuations. This highlights one point, made earlier –
prices represent private valuations, not social valuations.
There is a distinction between private and social valuations whenever there is an
externality. If, for example, oil is being subsidized, if there are no charges for greenhouse
gas emissions, the private value of a more fuel-efficient car may be low, while the social
value may be high. In this accounting framework, it appears that there is a trade-off:
tightening the environmental regulations for car producers shows up as a reduction for
the consumer in the value of the cars produced, as the car makers have to charge more for
something that consumers directly value little. But if we charged everyone for the value
of greenhouse gas emissions – if we made users of cars pay for the full value of their
“externalities”, their contribution to global warming – then, of course, the private
valuation of these emission reduction changes would be high. There would be no trade33. Systems of national income accounting typically impute the flow of housing services. In principle, if rents fall dramatically
(as they are in the United States today), the value of the flow of housing services will fall. From a (short-run) welfare
perspective, the effects are offsetting, the lower (imputed) rental income as homeowners being offset by lower rent
payments. Neither is there any real change in economic activity, since individuals are doing exactly the same thing as they
were doing before. There is a change in the market value of these imputations. If, somehow, the economy managed to get
itself through this episode of declining rents without any change in employment and output of other goods, it would be
misleading to suggest a marked decline in GDP simply because of the decline in the value of imputed rents.

30

The Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress Revisited

off. Indeed, if, for some reason, car manufacturers were reluctant to produce low
emission cars, then regulations forcing the production of low emission cars would show
up as an increase in GDP. This discussion highlights that many of our perceived tradeoffs between environment and growth are little more than a statistical artifact.
101. Underestimating the extent of improvements in quality is equivalent to overestimating
the extent of inflation – highlighting the close link between the concerns of this Report
and other reports focusing on the measurement of inflation. For instance, an important,
but controversial, report reviewing the measurement of inflation in the United States,
the so-called Boskin Commission Report,34 argued that the US had been overestimating
the rate of inflation by between 1 and 2%, and thereby underestimating the real rate of
growth. Of that amount, it estimated that 0.6% was due to mismeasurement of quality
changes. Whatever its limitations, the Boskin Report had the merit of drawing attention
to the quality question, attempting to quantify its importance, and proposing measures
to deal with it.
102. In the coming years, especially difficult problems will be arising as we start to price
certain externalities, most importantly greenhouse gases. It might appear that charging
for greenhouse gases raises prices (assuming those charges are passed on) and is
therefore inflationary. If firms respond by investing more to produce the same real
output, say of cars, with less emissions, it will appear as if real output and productivity
has declined. Part of this decrease may be explained by the fact that the new cars are
more expensive to produce. But the output of greenhouse gases has a social cost – it is
an output with negative value. We should have been subtracting the value of this “bad”
from GDP. True output, valuing both the output of cars and the (negative) output of
greenhouse gases, may have actually increased. Again, the failure to assign the correct
valuation has given us an incorrect indication of what is happening to societal output.

Measuring the value of output of publicly produced goods and services
103. We have no good way of measuring the value of goods and services produced by the
government. We often use a simplification – we measure the output by the value of the
inputs. But this assumes that the increase in productivity in the government sector is the
same as in the rest of the economy, and that there is no “social dividend”. Consider, for
instance, what happens if we nationalized a private insurance company, providing the
same insurance policy to the holders. The services of the insurance industry when it is
private are measured by the inputs of labour (or other factors of production) plus the
profits. But if the government gives the insurance away freely, then, by definition, there
are no profits. Citizens pay for the costs, of course, through taxes. It is as if the
government sold the insurance at the market price and then rebated the profits through a
social dividend. Because there are no profits, the output of the nationalized industry will
be smaller than the output when it was in the private sector. But this is just a fiction of
the way we measure national output. There is a very important caveat here: studies that
argue that national output is lower in economies in which the government plays a more
34. Boskin, Michael J., E. Dulberger, R. Gordon, Z. Griliches, and D. Jorgenson (1996), “Toward a More Accurate Measure of
the Cost of Living”, Final Report to the US Senate Finance Committee, December 4.

31

REFLECTIONS AND OVERVIEW

important role in the economy may simply be reflecting accounting conventions. They
are not saying anything about reality. To do that, one would have to look at real
measures of productivity, for instance, cost per telephone line.
104. The import of this is that if there is faster productivity growth in the public sector than
in the private sector, our measure underestimates growth, and conversely if there is
slower growth. The problem arises when productivity in the public and private sector do
not move in tandem35, so real output does not move in tandem.
105. The difficulty is measuring these productivity increases – and while our analysis shows
that how we treat these sectors has large consequences, we cannot resolve whether
conventional measures are biased up or down, or whether there are systematic biases in
assessing well-being in one country relative to another. The fact that the US has poorer
health outcomes while spending more money suggests a lower level of efficiency in the
provision of health services, and taking this into account may markedly change our
perceptions of relative standards of living. And this is true, without even taking into
account differences in (health) “security”, differences in risks faced by citizens in
America versus other countries.
106. Measuring output by input (and therefore omitting “profits”) might seem to bias the
output of the public sector downward. It may, however, be true that in some countries
government provides public services that are not valued by their citizens or it provides
them in such an inefficient way that valuing output by input may provide an
overestimate of the value of the services. There may be, in effect, hidden transfer
payments in the public sector, and one should never confuse transfer payments with
economic activity.
107. There have been some attempts to measure and value output in the public sector,
especially in the UK36, prompted by the type of problems we have just exposed. To
understand the complexity of the valuation of output in the public sector, consider
education. We can ask, how many students are educated? If we spend more resources to
educate the same number of students, this would suggest that education productivity has
gone down. That may or may not be the case. If most of the extra resources go into
administration, it may be a sign of inefficient delivery mechanisms. If, however,
additional resources go into smaller class sizes, it may improve the quality of
education.37 A good measure would reflect this; there would be an increase in output,
even though there has been no change in the number of students educated. The worry is
that by focusing on the number of students, we build in the assumption that productivity
is declining, even when in the relevant sense, it is increasing. Consider a country where
immigration increases. Because of cultural and language problems this may require, to
maintain “quality”, a more than proportionate increase in the number of professors and/
or a reduction in class size. Should we then speak of a decrease in productivity, knowing
35. This assumes that wage growth moves with productivity, which it typically does. In the short run, however, the two may
again not move in tandem.
36. Tony Atkinson, “Measurement of Government Output and Productivity for the National Accounts”, Atkinson Review: Final
Report, HMSO, 31 January 2005, Palgrave-MacMillan.
37. Cf. e.g. Sid Glibert, “Quality Education: Does Class Size Matter?” Research File, April 1995, Vol. 1 No. 1; Christopher
Jespen and Steve Rivkin, “Class Size Reduction and Student Achievement: The Potential Tradeoff between Teacher Quality
and Class Size”, The Journal of Human Resources, Vol. 44, No. 1, 2009.

32

The Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress Revisited

that if these special efforts are not undertaken the overall quality of education would
decrease?
108. Alternatively, additional resources may go into providing better education to disabled
students. In this case, most students will not see any change in quality, but a few will see
marked changes (this is an example where distributional consequences are paramount).
109. We can measure the quality of the education of students – performance on test scores –
but that too is an intermediate variable. What we are really interested in is long-term
economic productivity (and perhaps even good and well-adjusted citizens). This may be
hard to assess. But even then, as we have noted, it doesn’t fully inform us of the value
added by the education system, because other societal changes (some related to the
economic system) may affect the quality of the inputs, the performance of the students
in the absence of the educational expenditures.
110. In the health sector, measures of input may be an even poorer indicator of output. It is
not the number of heart surgeries that is of concern, but how successful they are, and
there have been marked improvements.38
111. Fortunately, we do have some indicators of overall success (even if they are imperfect
measures of value added): in the area of health, life expectancy, child mortality39, etc.,
and in the area of education, performance on test scores. (Test scores are only relevant
to the extent that they correlate with future productivity or broader measures of wellbeing, but they are a better indicator than number of students educated.) While
improvements in these areas should not be viewed simply as the outcome of the health
(medical) or education system, because of impacts of other changes in the economy and
society (health, as we have noted, is affected by diet and smoking), they can be viewed
as measures of societal progress more generally.
112. Health outcomes are an arena in which distribution is as important as it is for income.
There is, for instance, a wide dispersion of life expectancies. Several studies have
shown that the relation between income distribution and life expectancy is sufficiently
strong to produce significant associations in analyses of cross-sectional data and of data
covering changes over time. The correlation almost disappears for the higher deciles
(from the 7th to the 9th). The relationship is thus strongly non-linear, meaning than
health is more responsive to changes in income among the least well-off40.
113. For education outcomes, the best cross-country metrics of performance are provided by
the Pisa test. But this test may not be the best for comparison across time within a
country.
114. In the judiciary sector, an input-based measure of output may be especially misleading.
The output of the sector should be some measure of (confidence in) justice. But a
society characterized by a low level of trust between its citizens will have more courts,
38. David Cutler, Your Money or Your Life, Strong Medicine for America’s Health Care System, Oxford University Press, 2005.
39. It is not easy to measure how our health care system is doing in extending life or reducing infant mortality. Cf. Angus
Deaton, David Cutler and Adriana Lleras-Muney, “The Determinants of Mortality”, Journal of Economic Perspectives,
2006.
40. R.G. Wilkinson, “Income Distribution and Life Expectancy”, British Medical Journal, 18 January 1992.

33

REFLECTIONS AND OVERVIEW

more lawyers, and more conflicts. The consequent increase in GDP would not be a good
measure of an increase in societal welfare.
115. While there are methodological disagreements about how to make the adjustments to
quality or the measurement of government output, there is a broad consensus that some
adjustments should be made, and even about the principles that should guide such
adjustments. The disagreements arise in the practical implementation of these
principles.

V. Economic Activity and Societal Well-Being
116. So far, we have focused on measures of economic activity, and even more narrowly, of
market activity. But we are interested in measures of well-being. Here we will follow in
the second tradition on national income measurement, launched notably by the work of
Hicks and Samuelson, focusing on welfare measurement.
117. But going from a measure of market economic activity to a measure of economic wellbeing involves measurement, valuation, and conceptual problems (e.g. what aspects of
economic activity should and should not be included).
118. While measures of economic activity focus on production, measures of well-being
focus on household income and consumption. When we adjust for changes in prices, the
market basket of consumption goods (reflected in the consumer price index) is different
from the market basket of produced goods (reflected in what is called the GDP
deflator). In addition, the market basket of consumption goods consumed by the rich
and the poor, by the young and the old, by those in cities and those in rural areas, may
differ markedly, and so we should have a different consumer price index for each of
these groups. Reporting what happens to relative nominal incomes may not tell us all
we want to know about relative real incomes. The most obvious example relates to the
rapid rate of increase in urban housing and medical costs, with the result that the real
income of both the elderly – at least those who are not sufficiently subsidized through
an insurance scheme – and urban dwellers may be rising less rapidly than would be
suggested by looking at their incomes and deflating by the “average” consumer price
index.
119. When we look at an open economy, two important adjustments need to be made. We
have already discussed one: income from domestic production may accrue to foreign
companies and citizens, so measures of what is produced in the country (such as Gross
Domestic Product) may differ from measures of the income of those within the country
(Gross National Product, , GNP, which had been the dominant metric before 1990, the
gross income (i.e. ignoring depreciation) of those living in the country. In the Report,
we present refinements on this concept.)
120. The second adjustment relates to price changes. There may be marked differences
between the prices of the goods produced by the country and the prices of the goods
consumed by the country. This is most obvious in the case of oil exporters, who face

34

The Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress Revisited

large fluctuations in the price of what they produce relative to the price of what they
consume. The level of economic activity – the amount of oil produced – may change
little, but the level of consumption that this oil may sustain may vary greatly.
121. For households, capital gains on the assets that they own can be an important part of
their “income”. Yet national income statistics usually exclude these gains. The increases
in stock and housing prices during the 1990s and the early years of this decade were an
important contributor to individuals’ sense of well-being, and the capital losses in 2008
contributed significantly to individuals’ sense of a decrease in well-being. Year-to-year
variations in wealth valuation should presumably be taken into account only if we are
confident that markets value wealth correctly, an issue that we discuss more extensively
in Section 1 above and Chapter 3 of the main Report, where we tackle the sustainability
issue.
122. In addition to these two adjustments, several others are required in going from a
measure of economic activity to a measure of individual well-being. Typically, we
subtract out taxes to obtain a measure of (household) disposable income. Individuals do
not directly get enjoyment out of the taxes they pay, but they do benefit from the
services that government provides, and that is why it is important to add back in the
(correct) value of public services. A few other adjustments are required to take account
of: (a) intermediate goods; (b) security; (c) defensive expenditures; (d) leisure; (e) nonmarket activity; and (f) depreciation, resource depletion, and the degradation of the
environment. Non market activity is discussed in section VI, and the issues posed by
depreciation and depletion are postponed to the discussion of sustainability (Section
VIII). The first three adjustments (combined with the other adjustments previously
described) give us a measure that is sometimes referred to as adjusted disposable
income41. The table below gives the real adjusted disposable income for France, the US
and Finland. But in order to proceed to international comparisons we need to deflate
nominal income or consumption. The problem is that both relative prices and
consumption baskets differ across countries. Constructing appropriate price indices or
Purchasing Power Parities (PPPs) have a long tradition in the OECD countries.
Worldwide PPPs are periodically released by the World Bank. Their use avoids the
many defects of comparisons based on nominal exchange rates. If, for example, the euro
suddenly appreciates by 20% vis-à-vis the dollar, that does not mean that the adjusted
disposable income of Europeans suddenly jumps by 20% relative to that of Americans.
Of course, all the problems of construction of price indices apply to the construction of
PPPs. Still, there is a broad consensus that PPPs provide the best bases of cross-country
comparisons of standards of living.
123. The table below shows that the difference in real adjusted disposable income between
France and the US—taking into account the benefits received from the government as
well as the taxes taken away-- is much smaller (more than 20% smaller) than the
difference in real disposable income between the two countries, just because the social
transfers in kind received by the population are much greater in France. Indeed, the
41. Though the term “disposable” may not be fully appropriate, since individuals may not have “control” over the value of
public services they receive. If the government has a balanced budget, and if the value of output is correctly valued by the
value of inputs, then adding back the value of public services while subtracting out the value of taxes would leave the value
of disposable income unchanged..\

35

REFLECTIONS AND OVERVIEW

differences in real adjusted disposable income are less than the difference in real per
capital GDP.
Table 3. Real income of households, comparisons across countries, 2005

Real disposable income* per capita*

USD
USA=100

Real adjusted disposable income** per capita

USD
USA=100

Real GDP per capita (total economy)

USD
USA=100

France

United States

Finland

19338

29448

14395

66

100

49

25378

32110

21771

79

100

68

30519

41740

30460

73

100

73

*For private households and non-profit institutions serving households; net of depreciation; converted with PPPs for final consumption expenditure
**Equals disposable income corrected for social transfers in kind and converted with PPPs for actual individual consumption

Source: OECD Annual National Accounts.

a. Intermediate Goods
124. The general principle that intermediate goods should not be included as part of final
output (income), because their value is already included in that of final goods, is well
accepted and has already been discussed; yet it is not always clear what is an
intermediate good. Most problematic are expenditures on the financial sector, where
problems are compounded by the failure of other assumptions of the standard model.
Consumers are not always well informed and markets are not always perfectly
competitive, so that some expenditures – many would say a significant fraction of
certain categories of expenditure – are really simply a transfer of income from
households to the financial sector. The real issue here is the measurement of the
“services” provided by that sector. These are measured by inputs augmented by profits.
Again, such adjustments would not be so important, were it not for the importance that
this sector has taken in some economies (accounting for a third or more of corporate
profits).

b. Security
125. There is ample evidence that security – physical security, health security, and economic
security – affects individuals’ sense of well-being. Changes in security represent some
of the important changes in our societies. There has, in some cases, been improvement
in the ability of markets to manage risks. Governments have taken on changing roles in
managing risk. But neither in the case of the market or of government are the changes
unambiguous in nature. Many countries have shifted from defined benefit to defined
contribution pension schemes, and at the same time have cut back on publicly provided
pensions. This has increased retirement insecurity. These are important changes in
societal well-being, and yet the value of the “retirement security” provided traditionally
by employers or by government is not captured in our system of national accounts.

36

The Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress Revisited

126. Better (or worse) macro-economic management may result in less (or greater) economic
volatility. Better (or worse) social insurance means that the risk borne by citizens as a
result of this volatility may be less (or greater). It is possible but difficult to value the
risk that individuals face – what they would pay to reduce or eliminate the risk – but our
system of national accounts does not do this. For poor individuals, unable to access
credit markets, with little savings beyond their retirement accounts, even a short period
of unemployment may impose great hardship. But this problem is greater in the United
States, where the loss of a job is typically associated with the loss of health insurance. In
developing countries where the system of social protection is embryonic, economic
stability is even more important, as fluctuations of output may have irreversible
consequences on the destiny of important fractions of the population.
127. These are changes that have been a consequence of alterations in our economic system,
which have large import for societal well-being, and yet our system of economic
accounts does not reflect these changes. In assessing economic performance – both
changes in time and differences across countries – we need to develop better metrics, at
least for the extent of economic insecurity.
128. Economic security naturally falls within the remit of a system of economic accounts.
But so too do other dimensions of security that affect well-being, such as our sense of
physical security.

c. Defensive Expenditures
129. Increases in spending for security guards to protect property or prisons to incarcerate
societal offenders are included in our system of national accounts, but the question is,
should they be? These are not inconsequential – earlier, we noted the substantial
spending in the United States on prisons. In the case of security guards employed by
firms, these are intermediate expenditures – a cost of production. But more difficult
problems (discussed in section 2.2) are raised by expenditures by households and
government. This raises the fundamental questions posed earlier for other categories of
public expenditure: We should be measuring the “output”, our sense of security; instead,
we measure inputs. And, in assessing the economic system, we should be measuring the
net value added by the economic (and perhaps social) system. If failings in the socioeconomic system lead to more insecurity (crime), for instance, as a result of failures in
education, then the increased expenditures on police and prisons is simply offsetting the
deficiencies in our education system. Savings in one account are offset by increased
expenditures in another. If, however, the increase in crime is a result of some exogenous
force, unrelated to the socio-economic system, then the increased expenditures on
prisons are increasing welfare relative to what it would otherwise have been. Social
progress may be less than we would have hoped (because of the adverse changes in
behaviour), and our metrics of social progress should reflect this fact; but there has been
an increase in the “value added” of the economic system, in undoing these adverse
changes, and our metrics of economic performance should reflect this as well.
130. As we noted earlier, there are many aspects of changes in expenditures in the process of
modernization that fall within this category – the increased expenditures on
environmental services to offset the costs of urbanization (the benefits of which, for
instance, are reflected in the system of economic accounts in transportation costs that

37

REFLECTIONS AND OVERVIEW

are lower than they otherwise would have been). With the rise in the world’s urban
population from 1.6 billion to 3.3 billion in the last 30 years, these “urban defensive”
expenditures may not be inconsiderable.42

d. Leisure
131. A final extension of our standard model is to include leisure. Not including leisure in a
measure of societal well-being would bias our measurement system to encourage the
provision of goods and services – a bias that we should be particularly sensitive about as
the world faces environmental problems posed by high levels of production. Standard
theories suggest that societies might rationally take some of the benefits resulting from
improvements in technology in the form of increased leisure – and it may be a symptom
of a dysfunctional society if that is not the case. Yet a society’s decision to enjoy more
leisure as it becomes better-off would be counted against it in standard measures of
GDP and the variants discussed so far. Some account of changes in leisure over time
and differences in leisure need to be made, though again, as in so many of the other
areas of non-market activity, there are problems of measurement and valuation, which
are discussed at length in Chapter 1of the main Report.
132. A particular problem is posed by involuntary unemployment – where individuals cannot
work as much as they would like – or they enjoy more leisure and/or home work than
they would like. Even if we had data with which we could ascertain what fraction of the
additional time were devoted to leisure, we would have a problem of valuing it –
because it is, in part, involuntary, the value is less than the (marginal) wage. (The
problem of involuntary unemployment includes not just the “officially” unemployed,
but also those working part-time involuntarily, because they could not find full-time
employment.) But still, individuals can choose to engage in non-market activity
(discussed in the next section), so that the value of leisure should be at least as great as
the (marginal) imputed value of labour devoted to non-market activity.

VI. Non-Market Economic activity
133. GDP – and our modifications – began as a measurement of market activity (in the
broadest sense of the term, including government). But much activity occurs outside the
market, and this too has important implications for societal well-being.
134. Accordingly, the second set of changes focuses on going beyond market production to
non-market production. As we noted, we already do this, in the case of owner-occupied
housing. But home production is far more important. Here, even more than in the areas
previously discussed, we encountered measurement and valuation problems – how
42. Nordhaus and Tobin’s classic study that attempts to come up with a better measure of societal well-being included
significant adjustments for these defensive expenditures. For example, they propose to subtract from total private
consumption a number of components that do not contribute positively to welfare, in particular, commuting.

38

The Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress Revisited

much of the activity has occurred, and how do we value these activities relative to, say,
market activities. Some of the same problems referred to earlier arise in the
measurement of improvements in productivity and changes in quality. As we broaden
the scope of our definition, we have to rely increasingly on imputations, on educated
guesses, and this reduces the confidence we have in the numbers, and thus their
usefulness. This reliance on imputations is of particular concern because the magnitude
of non-market activity (as conventionally measured) is so large. We are caught in a
dilemma: because it is so large, to ignore it is to ignore important elements of human
activity.
135. To be sure, we have much more data today to ascertain what individuals do when they
are not engaged in work. Time-use studies allow us to break down more precisely the
kinds of non-market activities individuals are engaged in. Problems of ascertaining
which activities are “intermediate goods”, which are forms of “leisure”, and which are
really non-market “production” abound. For instance, driving to work is part of the cost
of market activity that is not reflected in market data. If a society spends more time
traveling to work, it is not an increase in final output, but really reflects a reduction in
productivity, almost surely reflected in a reduction in leisure (or perhaps some other
market or non-market activity).
136. We may be more confident about measuring certain changes – shifts from home
production to market production that occur broadly within society – and it would be
wrong not to make note of these changes. Failing to do so may seriously bias our
estimates of improvements in societal well-being. As we have already noted, as
countries develop, there is often a shift from home to market production. The increases
in market production may thus overstate increases in well-being. By the same token,
policies that encourage market over non-market production distort the economy. Those
engaged in non-market production often argue that not to include it in our measure of
societal well-being is to devalue the important services provided by those who are
engaged in these non-market activities. An important example may help make the point
stronger. There is a serious omission in the valuation of home-produced goods – the
value of breast milk. This is clearly within the System of National Accounts production
boundary, is quantitatively non-trivial and also has important implications for public
policy and child and maternal health43.

VII. Societal Well-Being
137. The amendments we propose to traditional GDP accounting are incremental
improvements. They allow us to come closer to what really matters for citizens, their
well-being, or more generally, the quality of their lives. But while these are
improvements, they leave out much that is important, partly because they focus on the
43. For a good discussion of this issue, cf. Julie Smith and Lindy Ingham, “Mother’s Milk and Measures of Economic Output”,
Feminist Economics, Vol. 11, No. 1, March 2005, pp. 41 – 62.

39

REFLECTIONS AND OVERVIEW

present, and partly because well-being has a much broader content. It includes in effect
the full range of factors that make life worth living, reaching beyond its material side.
Fortunately, innovations in social science research provide us tools with which we can
assess individuals’ sense of their own well-being.

VII-1 Happiness, well-being and quality of life
138. Before beginning our discussion of broader metrics of societal well-being, some
clarification is in order. In the public debate, the notions of Happiness, Well-being and
Quality of life are used almost as if they were synonymous, but there are some
distinctions that may prove useful. Without entering a semantic debate, it seemed to us
from the outset that, while all of these notions have a subjective component, some might
be better suited for measurement. In particular, there is a notion of “quality of life”
(described more fully in the Report) that is more suited for measurement and for
comparative assessment. In the discussion below, we will use this term interchangeably
with the term “well-being”.
139. The central problem can be explained in the following way: all approaches to the
measurement of the quality of life based on (marketed) resources (or on people’s
command over commodities) remain limited in important ways. First, many resources
are not marketed. Second, many of the determinants of human well-being are not
resources but aspects of people’s life-circumstances. Lastly, resources are means that
are transformed into well-being in ways that differ across people: those individuals with
greater capacities for enjoyment or greater abilities for achievement in valuable
domains of life may be better-off even if they command fewer economic resources.44
These arguments, by themselves, suggest that metrics based solely on access to or
command over resources are inadequate metrics for quality of life. Which other
metric(s) should be used for assessing quality of life depends on the philosophical
perspective taken.
140. Recent advances in research have led to new and credible measures. These measures,
while not replacing conventional economic indicators, now have the potential to move
from research to standard statistical practice. While some of these measures reflect
structural conditions that are relatively invariant over time but that differ systematically
across countries, others are more responsive to policies and more suitable for
monitoring changes over short periods of time. Both types of indicator play important
roles in measuring quality of life.

VII-2 Conceptual approaches to measuring quality of life
141. Three conceptual approaches have drawn the attention of the Commission as useful in
thinking about the measurement of quality of life.
142. The first approach, developed in close connection with psychological research, is based
on the notion of subjective well-being. A long philosophical tradition views individuals
as the best judges of their own conditions. (This approach is closely linked to the
44. To link this discussion with that of the preceding section: some individuals may be more efficient in “home production,”
others in market-production.

40

The Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress Revisited

utilitarian tradition but has a broader appeal due to the strong presumption, in many
streams of ancient and modern culture, that enabling people to be “happy” and
“satisfied” with their life is a universal goal of human existence.)
143. The second approach is rooted in the notion of capabilities. This approach conceives a
person’s life as a combination of various “doings and beings” (functionings) and of his
or her freedom to choose among these functionings (capabilities). Some of these
capabilities may be quite elementary, such as being adequately nourished and escaping
premature mortality, while others may be more complex, such as having the literacy
required to participate actively in political life. “In contrast with the utility-based lines
of thinking, individual advantage is judged in the capability approach by a person’s
capability to do things he or she has reason to value. A person’s advantage in terms of
opportunities is judged to be lower than that of another if she has less capability – less
real opportunity – to achieve those things that she has reason to value.45” It is why the
capability approach is focusing on freedom.
144. The third approach, developed within the tradition of welfare economics, weights the
various non-monetary dimensions of quality of life (beyond the goods and services that
are traded in markets) in a way that respects people’s preferences. Welfare economics
has traditionally relied on the notion of “willingness-to-pay” to extend the scope of
monetary measures to non-market aspects of life. But evaluations based on total
willingness-to-pay may disproportionately reflect the preferences of those who are
better-off in society. The “fair allocations approach”46 tries to overcome this weakness
of traditional welfare economics by explicitly referring to equity criteria. We use that
terminology below.
145. These approaches have obvious differences, but also similarities. All these approaches
point to the importance of a number of features for quality of life that go beyond
command over resources. Measuring these aspects of well-being or quality of life
requires the use of types of data (i.e. responses to questionnaires and non-market
observations of personal states) that are not captured by market transactions.

VII-3 Subjective measures of quality of life
146. In recent years, much research has focused on what people value and how they act in
real life. A significant part of this research has been undertaken by psychologists and
economists based on subjective data on people’s reported or experienced well-being.
147. Subjective measures have always been part of the traditional tool-kit of economists and
statisticians, as many features of our economies and societies (e.g. unemployment) are
measured through people’s responses to a standard set of questions. (Not working is an
objective statistic; but to be unemployed, one has to be “not working, but seeking
employment”; seeking employment is typically a subjective statement, not based on
particular actions, such as filling out an application form.) The specific feature of the
45. Amartya Sen, The Idea of Justice, op.cit.
46. Cf. Kolm S.C. 1972, Justice et équité, Paris: Ed. du CNRS. Translated as Justice and Equity, Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press,
2000. Cf. also the survey on the theory of fair allocations by Thomson W., H. Varian 1985, “Theories of justice based on
symmetry”, in Hurwicz, Schmeidler, Sonnenschein (eds.): Social Goals and Social Organizations (pp. 261–289).
Cambridge, UK: Cambridge University Press.

41

REFLECTIONS AND OVERVIEW

subjective measures of quality of life discussed here is that what people report about
their own conditions has no obvious objective counterpart: we can compare “perceived”
and “actual” inflation, for example, but only respondents can provide information on
their own subjective states and values. Despite this feature, a rich literature on these
subjective measures concludes that the results of these studies are replicable and they
help predict people’s behaviour.
148. Subjective approaches distinguish between the dimensions of quality of life (i.e.
people’s subjective experiences and their evaluations) and the objective factors shaping
them. They focus on the subjective dimensions of quality of life, which encompass
several aspects. The most important of these are: a) people’s evaluations, either of their
lives as a whole or of life’s various domains, such as family, work and financial
conditions; b) people’s actual feelings, such as pain, worry and anger, or pleasure, pride
and respect. Within this second broad category of people’s feelings, the research on
subjective well-being distinguishes between positive and negative affects, as both may
characterize the experience of each person.
149. All these aspects of subjective well-being (cognitive evaluations, positive and negative
affects) should be measured separately to get a satisfactory appreciation of people’s
lives. Subjective measures of people’s life-evaluations and affects provide measures of
quality of life that can be monitored over time; some of these measures can also be
compared across countries in reliable ways. The interest of these measures is that they
provide information beyond that conveyed by income. For example, younger and older
people in most developed countries report higher evaluations of their lives than primeage people, a pattern that contrasts sharply with that for income.
150. One point where various subjective measures of people’s well-being agree is that
unemployment has a very adverse effect on people’s quality of life. People who become
unemployed report lower life-evaluations, even after controlling for their lower income.
The adverse effects persist over time. The unemployed also report higher prevalence of
various negative affects (sadness, stress and pain) and lower levels of positive ones
(joy). One may also suspect that the adverse effects of unemployment are felt even by
those who are not themselves unemployed, especially in societies where there is high
unemployment. These subjective measures suggest that the costs of unemployment
exceed the income-loss suffered by those who lose their jobs, reflecting the existence of
non-pecuniary effects among the unemployed, and of fears and anxieties generated by
unemployment in the rest of society.
151. These important advances in the measurement of subjective well-being are largely the
result of the efforts of individual researchers and commercial data providers. But these
data remain limited in terms of the statistical inferences that they allow. National
statistical systems need to build on these efforts, and incorporate questions on various
aspects of subjective well-being in their standard surveys.

VII-4 Objective features shaping quality of life
152. Both the capability and the fair allocation approaches give prominence to the objective
conditions and opportunities available to people. Both of these conceptual approaches
regard an expansion of people’s opportunities in these domains as intrinsically

42

The Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress Revisited

important for people’s lives. Future research should help clarify the role played by these
objective features in subjective well-being, and might contribute to the critical task of
an assessment of the relative weights to be associated with different factors.
153. The range of objective features to be considered in any assessment of quality of life will
depend on the purpose of the exercise. In general, all these measures highlight that how
societies are organized makes a difference for people’s quality of life, and that their
influences are not all captured by conventional measures of the associated economic
resources.

a. Health
154. Health is a basic feature shaping both the length and the quality of people’s lives. Its
assessment requires good measures of both mortality and morbidity. Data gaps remain
significant in both fields. Mortality statistics by age and gender document the risk of
death confronting people and are used to calculate the expected length of a person’s life.
These indicators are today available in all developed countries but remain limited in
large parts of the developing world, in particular for adults, and this limits the
possibility of monitoring progress in achieving the UN Millennium Development
Goals.
155. The state of advancement is far more limited for statistics on morbidity, a situation that
has led to long-standing disagreements on whether or not declines in mortality have
been matched by similar declines in morbidity. Existing measures of morbidity rest on a
variety of sources: records of peoples’ height and weight; diagnostics from health
professionals; registers for specific diseases; and self-reports drawn for censuses and
surveys. The variety of measures and underlying data is inevitable given the many
manifestations of poor health, but is also a real obstacle to comparing countries and
monitoring changes in people’s health status over time. Measures are even sparser when
moving from physical to mental disorders, despite evidence that these affect (at least in
mild forms) a large share of people, that most of these disorders go untreated, and that
their incidence has been increasing in some countries.
156. The variety of dimensions of people’s health has led to several attempts to define a
summary measure that combines both mortality and morbidity. Several combined
indices of people’s health exist, but none currently commands universal agreement.
157. There are large differences in health outcomes as well as in access to those factors
(including resources) that affect health outcomes. National statistics that simply
describe average outcomes accordingly provide an inadequate description of a country’s
health status, and are an incomplete basis for making comparisons over time or across
countries, or for assessing either the extent of social progress or economic performance
even in this limited dimension.

b. Education
158. A long tradition of economic research has stressed the importance of education in
providing the skills and competencies that underpin economic production. But
education (like health) matters for quality of life independently of its effects on people’s
earnings and productivity. Education is strongly associated with people’s life-

43

REFLECTIONS AND OVERVIEW

evaluations even after controlling for their higher income. Further, better-educated
people typically have better health status, lower unemployment, more social
connections, and greater engagement in civic and political life. The consensus is that
education brings a range of returns (monetary and non-monetary) that benefit both the
person investing in education and the community in which they live. Measuring the size
of these wider benefits of education is an important research priority.
159. Available educational indicators cover a broad range of fields. Some refer to inputs (e.g.
school enrolment, educational expenditures and school resources), others refer to
throughputs and outputs (e.g. graduation rates, number of completed years of schooling,
standardized test measures of people’s achievements in terms of literacy and numeracy
or other cognitive skills). Which of these indicators is more relevant depends on the
stage of development of each country and on the goal of the evaluation exercise. The
available indicators highlight large differences across countries, with various different
educational indicators sometimes highlighting contrasting patterns. Within countries,
measures of inequalities in learning outcomes are especially important for youth at the
bottom of the achievement scale and who are at risk of poverty and exclusion from wellpaid and rewarding jobs in adult life. As education is an important predictor of many
dimensions of people’s lives, all social surveys should systematically include
information on the learning experiences of respondents and of their parents, as well as
information on other features that would enable a better assessment of the role of
education in shaping the quality of life.

c. The balance of time
160. How people spend their time, and the features of people’s personal activities, matter for
quality of life irrespectively of the income that they generate. They affect people’s
subjective well-being. The main activities discussed here are paid work, commuting,
unpaid work and leisure time. Housing, although not representing an activity per se, is
also discussed because it is the setting for a number of personal activities and because of
its importance for the quality of life.
161. Paid work matters for quality of life not just because it generates income with which
other material goods are purchased, but also because it provides identity to people and
opportunities to socialize with others. Not all jobs are equally valuable in this respect,
and this underscores the importance of collecting more systematic information on the
quality of paid work, as is being done in the context of ongoing research on “decent
work” pursued by a number of international organizations. Some national surveys
provide information on many aspects of the distance between work and decent work,
such as precarious employment, gender gaps in employment and wages, discrimination
in the workplace, etc. Their practical use is, however, limited by their small sample size
and by differences in the survey design across countries.
162. Commuting time is also a key feature of the quality of work, and its monitoring requires
information on the number of hours spent travelling to and from work, as well as on the
accessibility, quality and affordability of public transportation systems.
163. Unpaid domestic work, such as shopping and the care of children and other household
members, is important from the perspective of assessing both the total amount of
household services produced and how family chores are distributed between men and

44

The Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress Revisited

women. As we noted earlier, changes in technology may affect not only the productivity
of domestic work, but also the quality of the work experience. Certain activities, such as
cooking, depending on how they are conducted and the circumstances under which they
are conducted, may contribute either negatively or positively to a sense of well-being.
164. A long tradition of research has emphasized the importance of leisure-time for quality
of life. This points to the importance of developing indicators of both its quantity
(number of hours) and quality.
165. Finally, despite the importance of housing for a variety of social outcomes (such as
children’s education), no core set of housing indicators currently exists for international
comparisons: remedying this situation would require better information on the number
of people who are homeless or living in emergency shelters, and on housing quality
(e.g. in terms of overcrowding and the availability of local services).
166. In several cases, suitable indicators in these various fields already exist, and the
challenge is to improve upon what has been achieved in the past and to systemize the
collection and analysis of data so that meaningful comparisons can be made across
countries and over time. In other areas, however, existing measures remain seriously
deficient, and progress requires investment in new statistical capacity. A case in point,
cutting across all the activities described above, is that of measuring how people spend
their time and their subjective experiences with various activities. Time is the natural
metric for comparing personal activities, and one priority should be to develop
measurement tools grounded on clear definitions and based on surveys with a consistent
design, representative of patterns over a full year, and undertaken with sufficient
regularity (all being requirements that are not often met). These surveys should provide
information about both the amount of time spent in various activities and the enjoyment
that they provide.

VII-5 Political voice and governance
167. Political voice is an integral dimension of the quality of life. Intrinsically, the ability to
participate as full citizens, to have a say in the framing of policies, to dissent without
fear and to speak up against wrong are essential freedoms and capabilities.
168. The opportunities for expression and the degree of responsiveness of the political
system depend on the institutional features of each country, such as the presence of a
functioning democracy, universal suffrage, a free media, and civil society organizations.
This also depends on some key aspects of governance, such as legislative guarantees
and the rule of law. Legal guarantees require effective implementation, which depends
on how various institutions (e.g. the police, the judiciary and various administrative
services) function, whether they are free from corruption, political interference and
social prejudice, and whether they can be held accountable for their decisions.
169. Comparisons based on existing indicators of political voice, legislative guarantees and
the rule of law highlight vast differences between countries, especially between those
with a long history of democratic functioning and those that have moved from
authoritarian to democratic regimes only more recently and that have not yet established
the full range of freedom and rights. Even in the developed world, however, low trust in

45

REFLECTIONS AND OVERVIEW

public institutions and declining political participation point to a growing gap in how
citizens and political elites perceive the functioning of democratic institutions.
170. Indicators of political voice and democratic governance should help evaluate the
functioning of multiparty democracy and universal suffrage, the degree of
decentralization in government decisions and the sense of participation have in the
decisions being made, the presence of a free media and various freedoms (e.g. to form
and join civil organizations, trade unions and professional bodies, or to participate in
civic and social activities). Relevant indicators should cover the rights embedded in
constitutions, laws, international covenants on human rights and basic freedoms, as well
as the functioning of the judicial system. Indicators of many of these aspects are
typically compiled by bodies outside the boundaries of national statistical systems and
are mainly based on the opinion of experts. These indicators need to be complemented,
and in some cases replaced, by surveys on citizens’ own perceptions about the
functioning of political, legal and executive institutions, the difficulties they face in
accessing them, and the trust that they place in them. Such surveys also need to capture
inequalities in access to these institutions across socio-economic groups.

VII-6. Social connections
171. Social connections improve quality of life in a variety of ways. The effects are both
direct and indirect. People with more social connections report higher life-evaluations,
and for many the most pleasurable personal activities involve socializing. The benefits
of social connections extend to people’s health and to the probability of finding a job, as
well as to various characteristics of the neighbourhood where people live (e.g. crime or
the performance of local schools). These social connections are sometimes described as
“social capital” to highlight the benefits (direct and indirect) that they bring.
172. The drivers of changes in people’s social connections are not always well understood,
and should be an important arena of research. Developments within markets as well as
certain government policies may have reduced the ties of individuals with their
community. What is clear is that a decline in these ties may negatively affect people’s
lives, even when certain of the “economic” functions associated with these social ties
are taken up by market or government alternatives, and even when these alternatives
increase the level of (measured) economic activity (as in the case where the informal
surveillance of neighbours is replaced by salaried security guards, or when family
“insurance” is replaced by market insurance).
173. Research on social connections has traditionally relied on proxy measures, such as the
number of associations to which each person belongs, or the frequency of activities
assumed to result from social connections (e.g. altruistic behaviour and voter turn-out).
However, it is by now accepted that these are not good measures of social connections,
and that reliable measures require surveys that inform about peoples’ behaviours and
activities. In recent years, a number of statistical offices (in the United Kingdom,
Australia, Canada, Ireland, the Netherlands and, most recently, the United States) have
started surveys that measure various forms of social connections, such as civic and
political engagement, membership and voluntary work in various organizations,
relationship with neighbours and family members etc. Similar surveys should be
implemented elsewhere, based on questions and protocols that allow valid comparisons

46

The Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress Revisited

across countries and over time. Progress should also be made in measuring additional
dimensions of social connections (such as trust in others, social isolation, availability of
informal support in case of need, engagement in the workplace and in religious
activities, friendship across lines of race, religion and social class), building on the
experience already accumulated by some countries in these fields.

VII-7. Environmental conditions
174. Environmental conditions are important not only for sustainability, but also because of
their immediate impact on the quality of people’s lives. First, they affect human health
both directly (through air and water pollution, hazardous substances and noise) and
indirectly (through climate change, transformations in the carbon and water cycles,
biodiversity loss and natural disasters that affect the health of ecosystems). Secondly,
people benefit from environmental services, such as access to clean water and
recreation areas, and their rights in this field (including rights to access environmental
information) have been increasingly recognized. Third, people value environmental
amenities or disamenities, and these valuations affect their actual choices (e.g. of where
to live).
175. Measuring the effects of environmental conditions on people’s lives is, however,
complex. These effects manifest themselves over different timescales, and their impacts
vary depending on people’s characteristics (e.g. where they live and work, their
metabolic intake).
176. Much progress has been achieved in the last two decades in terms of measuring
environmental conditions. However, from a quality-of-life perspective, existing
indicators remain limited in important respects: for example, indicators of emissions
mainly refer to the aggregate quantities of various pollutants, rather than to the share of
people exposed to dangerous doses. Existing indicators should hence be supplemented
by regular monitoring, for instance, the number of premature deaths from exposure to
air pollution; the number of people lacking access to water services and to nature; or
the number who are exposed to hazardous levels of noise and pollution, etc. In addition,
more work is needed to relate changes in environmental indicators to changes in wellbeing.

VII-8. Personal insecurity
177. Assessing personal insecurity requires identifying those external factors that put at risk
the physical integrity of each person: crimes, accidents, and natural disasters are some
of the most obvious factors. While these elements account for only a minority of all
deaths, and they are captured by general mortality statistics, the rationale for having
specific measures of their frequency is that they can have a different emotional effect
than deaths related to medical conditions. The importance of these sources of insecurity
on people’s subjective well-being is reflected both in their efforts to avoid physical
insecurity and the large impacts of bereavement on subjective well-being.
178. Manifestations of personal insecurity affect quality of life for a large number of people,
with even larger numbers reporting fears of being a victim of a physical aggression. The
most remarkable feature of these reports on subjective fears is how little they are related

47

REFLECTIONS AND OVERVIEW

to experienced victimization: countries with a higher share of people reporting fear of
crime do not have a higher frequency of experienced victimization while, within
countries, older and richer people feel more unsafe than younger and poorer people,
despite being less likely to be a victim of crime.
179. These patterns highlight the importance of developing more regular and reliable
measures of personal security to orient public discussions. Victimization surveys are an
essential tool. But other tools need to be mobilized to assess the importance of other
threats to personal security, such as domestic violence and violence in countries ravaged
by conflicts and wars.47

VII-9. Economic insecurity
180. Uncertainty about the material conditions that may prevail in the future reflects the
existence of a variety of risks, in particular associated with unemployment, illness, and
old age. The realization of these risks has obvious negative consequences for the quality
of life of the person affected.
181. Job loss can lead to economic insecurity when unemployment is recurrent or persistent,
the replacement rate is low, and workers have to accept major cuts in pay, hours or both
to find a new job. The consequences of job instability are both immediate (as
replacement income is typically lower than the earnings on the previous job) and longer
term (due to potential losses in wages when the person does find another job). While
indicators of these consequences are available for some countries, cross-country
comparisons are difficult, requiring special investments in this direction. Fears of job
loss can have negative consequences for the quality of life of each worker (e.g. physical
and mental illness, tensions in family life), for firms (e.g. adverse impacts on workers’
motivation and productivity, lower identification with corporate objectives) and for
society as a whole.
182. Illness can cause economic insecurity both directly, through the medical costs
associated with it, and indirectly, through the loss of income due to inability to work.
One indicator of economic insecurity due to illness is provided by the share of people
without health insurance. However, health insurance can cover different contingencies,
and even insured people may incur high out-of-pocket health expenses in the event of
illness.
183. Old-age is not a risk per se, but it can still imply economic insecurity due to uncertainty
about the needs and resources that will be available after having withdrawn from the
labour market. Two types of risk, in particular, are important. The first is the risk of
inadequate resources during retirement, due to insufficient pension payments in the
future. Even when there is no risk associated with the pension amounts, there may be
uncertainty about the adequacy of pension payments when they are not indexed to
inflation. And even when they are inflation-indexed, if well-being is affected by relative
income then when incomes of workers are rising rapidly, the aged may feel a risk of
relative deprivation. The second is the risk of volatility in pension payments: while all
47. This is an example where the collection of objective data might actually affect individual perceptions, and therefore there
sense of well-being.

48

The Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress Revisited

retirement-income systems are exposed to some types of risk, the greater role of the
private sector in financing old-age pensions and the consequent shifting of risks from
government and firms towards individuals has led to increasing the volatility of pension
payments.
184. A comprehensive measure of economic insecurity would ideally account for both the
frequency of each risk and its consequences, and some attempts in this direction have
been made. A further problem is that of aggregating across the various risks that shape
economic insecurity, as the indicators that describe these risks lack a common metric to
assess their severity.

VII-9. On the interdependence of the various dimensions of quality of life
185. Most of the measurement challenges described above are specific to each feature of
quality of life, and the Commission has only hinted at some of the work required,
leaving it to future work in each field to detail a concrete action plan. Other challenges
are, however, cross-cutting and unlikely to be picked up through initiatives separately
undertaken in each field. Three of these issues deserve special attention.
Assessing links across quality of life dimensions
186. The first cross-cutting challenge is to better assess the relationship between the various
dimensions of quality of life. Some of the most important policy questions for quality of
life relate to how developments in one area (e.g. education) affect developments in
others (e.g. health status, political voice and social connections), and how developments
in all fields are related to those in income. In effect, ignoring the cumulative effects of
multiple disadvantages will provide an inaccurate assessment of the extent of certain
social problems, possibly leading to sub-optimal policies: for example, if the loss in
quality of life of being both poor and sick far exceeds the sum of the two separate
effects, governments may need to target their interventions more on those who cumulate
these disadvantages.
187. Assessing these links across various dimensions of quality of life will not be easy, as
statistical systems continue to be highly segmented across disciplines. But progress can
be achieved by developing information on the “joint distribution” of the most salient
features of quality of life (such as health status, education, political voice, etc.). across
all residents in a country. Concrete steps in this direction could be accomplished by
including in all surveys a few standard questions that allow classifying respondents
based on a limited set of characteristics that describe their conditions in a broad range of
fields.
b. Inequalities in quality of life
188. The second cross-cutting challenge is to develop indicators of quality of life that
provide information about the inequalities in individual conditions in the various
dimensions of quality of life rather than just about the average conditions in each
country. When combined with work on the linkages across “conditions” we can obtain
better assessments of the extent of inequalities in quality of life.

49

REFLECTIONS AND OVERVIEW

189. While established methodologies and data sources could allow measuring inequalities
in the distribution of economic resources in a fairly reliable way, the situation is much
less satisfactory with respect to non-monetary dimensions of quality of life.
190. The problems, however, go deeper than developing suitable measures. There are many
types of inequalities, and each of them is significant in itself: this suggests that we
should avoid the presumption that one of them will always encompass all others. At the
same time, because of the links among dimensions, various types of inequalities may
strengthen each other. Gender disparities, for example, while pervasive in most
countries and groups, are typically much larger for households with lower socioeconomic status: the combined effect of gender and socio-economic inequality is often
to exclude young women from poor households from attending school and getting
rewarding jobs, denying them possibilities of self-expression and political voice, and
exposing them to hazards that put at risk their health.
191. There exists a wealth of interesting research on inequality and deprivation in
dimensions other than material resources, and much has been written on the role of
composite indicators. For instance, Mackenbach (2006) points out that between-group
difference are especially important in the case of health. In all countries around the
world, people with lower education, lower income and from lower occupational classes
tend to die at younger ages and to have, within their shorter lifetimes, a higher
prevalence of different health problems. In European countries, the mortality rates of
less-educated men are, on average, 50% higher than those of more-educated men, while
the difference is 30% for women48. A 2006 OECD study on education highlights the
magnitude of the differences in within education: the test scores (in science) of students
aged 15 in France were around 146 points higher at the top quarter of the achievement
scale than at the bottom quarter, a difference equivalent to almost 4 years of
schooling49. With respect to composite indicators, detailed surveys of the many
initiatives in this area are provided by Afsa et al. (2008) and Gadrey and Jany-Catrice
(2007)50.
192. Building on this work, it is critical that inequalities be assessed in a comprehensive way,
by looking at differences in quality of life across people, groups and generations.
Further, as people can be classified according to different criteria, each with some
relevance for the quality of people’s lives, inequalities should be measured and
documented for a plurality of groups. Appropriate surveys should be developed to
assess the complementarities between the various types of inequalities, and to identify
their underlying causes.
c. Aggregating across quality-of-life dimensions
193. The third challenge to quality-of-life research is that of aggregating the rich array of
measures in a parsimonious way. The search for a scalar measure of quality of life is
48. Mackenbach, J. P., “Health Inequalities: Europe in Profile”, UK Presidency of the EU, February 2006.
49. OECD, “Programme for International Student Assessment” (2006).
50. Afsa, C., Blanchet, D., Marcus, V., Mira d’Ercole, M., Pionnier, P.A., Ranuzzi, G., Rioux, L. and Schreyer, P. (2008),
“Survey of existing approaches to measuring socio-economic progress”, background paper for the first meeting of the
CMEPSP, Paris, April 2008. Gadrey, J. and Jany-Catrice, F. (2007), “Les nouveaux indicateurs de richesse”, 2nd edition,
Repères-La Découverte, Paris.

50

The Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress Revisited

often perceived as the single most important challenge in this field. While this emphasis
is partly misplaced – there are still important challenges in the construction of each of
the indices, and the information content of any aggregate index will always reflect the
quality of the measures used in its construction – there are important reasons to attempt
to construct aggregate metrics.
194. Traditionally, the most common response to these demands for parsimony has been to
aggregate a number of indicators (suitably selected and scaled) of average performance
in various fields at the country-level. The best example of this approach is the Human
Development Index. This measure has played an important information and
communication role, leading to country-rankings that differ significantly from those
based on per-capita GDP, especially for some less developed countries. However, all
choices on the weights used to construct this (and other similar indices) are
controversial – they are either arbitrary or reflect value judgments on which there is not
broad consensus. More fundamentally, many such indices (including the HDI) ignore
the distribution of individual conditions within each country and the linkages among
conditions. As a result, the combined country-wide index will not change if average
performance in each domain remains the same while the correlation of individual
conditions across domains declines.
195. Several aggregate measures of quality of life are possible, reflecting the various
conceptual approaches discussed. Some of these measures are already being used (e.g.
average levels of life satisfaction51 for a country as a whole). Others could be
implemented if national statistical systems made the necessary investment to collect and
make public the type of data needed to allow their computation.

Concluding remarks
196. It is clear that individual’s sense of well-being is affected not just by their material
goods (appropriately measured and valued), but by many other factors, some of which
we have called attention to earlier in this overview. For some of these, there may exist
objective metrics, but for others, subjective assessments may provide the best approach
to measurement. Individuals may, for instance, be affected by their sense of security,
and by their bonds with others. But even the seemingly non-economic factors are
affected by economic structures. Reforms in the workplace may lead to increased
market efficiency, but lower worker job satisfaction, and therefore a reduction in their
sense of well-being. One of the criticisms of globalization (in the way it has proceeded)
is that it has contributed to the weakening of a sense of community.
197. Moreover, it is important to understand more fully the links between various measures
of market and non-market activity and of leisure and these quality-of-life metrics. It is
not clear how well the relative marginal contributions of various goods and services to
well-being correspond to market prices.
198. This work is just at its beginning stage, and yet the results obtained so far are extremely
promising. Replicable measurement is possible.
51. Data on life-evaluations have been collected in several representative surveys. In several cases (e.g. various waves of the
World Values Survey), these measures are based on qualitative responses, such as feeling “quite” or “fairly” happy with
one’s life, or on other scales that assess life satisfaction.

51

REFLECTIONS AND OVERVIEW

VIII. Sustainability
199. Until now we have been concerned with the measurement of the “present”, whether in
quantitative or in qualitative terms – how, for instance, certain market or non-market
activities today affect the sense of well-being today. But our Commission aims at going
beyond the measurement of individual and societal well-being today, moving the
horizon towards the long run. What is missing in our information set to be tranquil
about the future? The answer is obviously our capacity to assess the sustainability of our
present situation and more generally of the economic, social, political and
environmental context in which we live.

VIII-1 What does sustainability mean?
200. Sustainability is a concept which by definition has a long-term dimension.
Sustainability refers, in a broad sense, to the notion of the durability and stability of
dynamic processes in the long run. Concern for the sustainability of economic
development can be traced back at least as far as Malthus’ famous population principle.
Long before the Club of Rome, the classics were predicting that the world will be
characterized in the long run by stagnation (zero growth), and though some of the
reasons for their gloom differed, these analyses were generally based on the fact of the
finiteness of the world.
201. More recently, the Brundtland Commission (1987) has popularized the definition of
sustainable development as “development that meets the needs of the present
generations without compromising the ability of the future generations to meet their
own needs”. This definition implicitly mixes social, environmental and economic
components of present and future well-being. But while the Brundtland report had the
great merit of underlining from the outset that sustainability was a multidimensional
phenomenon, it did not offer any precise evaluation of these components. It was, in this
sense, both too general and too abstract.
202. The plea for sustainable development has been sounded so repeatedly in political
discourse that sometimes it seems to have lost credibility, not only because actions did
not follow promises, but because the meaning of the concept was so fuzzy that everyone
was free to understand it according to their own interpretation.
203. At the micro level, sustainability means that individuals and/or families think that the
future for them and their children and grandchildren will be better than the past, or at
least not worse than the present. This positive expectation not only contributes to the
current generation’s sense of well-being, but also has consequences for the nature of
society. It has been argued, for instance, that when most families hold such hopes,
society becomes more tolerant, fairer, and more supportive of democracy52. The
opposite occurs when an economic evolution proves to be unsustainable. Fear of the
future generally leads to the development of protectionist attitudes, “beggar my
neighbour” policies, and anti-immigrant sentiments. None of this should come as a
surprise: precariousness, which is the converse of sustainability, is an impediment to a
52. Cf. Benjamin Friedman, The Moral Consequences of Economic Growth, Alfred A. Knopf, 2005.

52

The Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress Revisited

good life. Hence social progress, which is the thing people really care about, goes hand
in hand with sustainability. This is why it is essential to attempt to develop a metric to
account for it, however imperfect such a metric may be.
204. Whatever measure we devise, we have to recognize that it will be grounded on our
present imperfect knowledge of the future. Even high levels of consumption of natural
resources might be sustainable, if there is rapid enough technological progress.
205. Even if there are doubts about the precise or best measure, doubt does not justify
paralysis, and for the reasons set out above, there is some urgency to come up with a
measure or a set of measures of sustainability.
206. The literature gives many different definitions of sustainability. A very simple but
natural formulation is the following: Assume that C is the current state of consumption,
and W(C) is the wealth that is required to sustain that level of consumption forever.
Then consumption is weakly sustainable if the wealth bequeathed to the next generation
(time period) exceeds W(C). There is a more demanding concept of sustainability that
focuses not just on the level of consumption but also on its rate of growth. If C is a
consumption path – defined not just by the level of consumption but by its rate of
growth and if current resources are not sufficient to sustain that consumption path, then
the consumption path is not sustainable. The worry today is that, because of the
finiteness of our world, even sustainability in the weak sense might not be assured. This
worry is grounded on the concern that while the stock of some resources are increasing
(physical capital), these cannot compensate for the diminution of the stock of others—
in particular key environmental resources.
207. Much of the literature focuses the degree of substitutability between the different
components of wealth. The “weak” approach to sustainability considers that increases
in physical capital and/or human capital can compensate for losses in natural wealth, i.e.
that there always exists a positive degree of substitutability. This allows a global
assessment of sustainability using a single measure of “wealth”. “Weak” here means
that the requirement for sustainability is not too demanding, as it implies that a
sufficiently high pace of technical progress or savings is all that is needed to ensure
sustainability. The “strong” approach argues that sustainability requires separately
maintaining the quantity or quality of many different environmental resources. It is
motivated by a concern that we may not be able, for instance, to deal with the worsening
of the atmosphere by increases in the amounts of physical capital, or more generally,
that even if we could, there is a high degree of uncertainty about the trade-offs, so much
so that it is worth focusing on each of the key resources separately. Following this up
therefore requires large sets of separate statistics, each pertaining to one particular
subdomain of global sustainability.

VIII-2 On some complexities in measuring sustainability
208. 201. In principle, the most direct (and comprehensive) way to measure well-being in the
long run is “simply” to add future consumption to current consumption – weighed by
the appropriate marginal valuations (just as we add up the consumption of oranges and
apples), to get an appropriate long-run metric. If we followed that approach, we would
focus on “consumption” in each period, not on broader measures of national output,

53

REFLECTIONS AND OVERVIEW

which include investment. Investment is an intermediate good – an input into the
production of consumption in future years. In this approach, the critical decision is the
weight to attach to future consumption, that is the “discount rate”, which measures the
extent to which future consumption gets less weight than current consumption.53, a kind
of measure of the depreciation of the future.
209. 202. In this approach, if future feasible consumption is less than the current level, it is
obvious that the current level is not sustainable. If it exceeds the current level, it is
obvious that the level is sustainable.
210. There are some problems with this approach, quite apart from the fact that, as we have
seen above, the standard statistical apparatus may give a partial measure of total
consumption. A critical difference between consumption today and that in future years
is that we know today’s consumption, while we can only form expectations concerning
future consumption. Economists traditionally have a way around this problem: they turn
to the market to assign values, just as they do contemporaneously; the value of an asset
is the expected present discounted value of the dividends (returns) that it yields. Thus,
by looking at asset values, we can estimate the value of (expected) future consumption –
or at least that part of future consumption that will be generated by our land, physical
and human capital and other resources.
211. Recent events have cast doubt (for those who previously did not have such doubts) on
the extent to which the current market prices of assets provide good assessments.
212. Risk itself poses considerable complexity in interpreting what we should mean by
sustainability. Assume that there is uncertainty about the future rate of technological
progress. Should sustainability require that we have a 99% probability of continuing
current levels of consumption? A 99.9% probability? If we impose a very high
probability, we would force the current generation to sacrifice current consumption for
future generations, who almost surely will be much better-off.54 Again, we often rely on
market risk assessments. But the current crisis has again highlighted the risk of doing
so. The market may overestimate the ease with which physical capital can substitute for
the loss of natural capital, and as a result, may assign too low of a probability to the risk
that current levels of consumption are not sustainable. This is belabouring the obvious,
as markets are certainly not as far-sighted as to account for what may happen in two or
three generations! Can we do better than the market? That is almost a philosophical
question which can be answered, considering the deep uncertainty surrounding the
issue, only by political decisions based on some form of consensus. Besides, what is of
concern is the well-being of future generations. This is an issue of intertemporal equity,
and interest rates are of limited relevance in providing guidance on this issue.55 Making
matters worse is that markets for key environmental variables (like “carbon”) do not
exist, and the dramatic change in prices that might occur were appropriate social prices
53. The appropriate discount rate has been one of the critical issues under debate in the environmental literature. It is more
relevant for discussions of policy than the issues upon which the Commission focuses. Those who believe that we should
discount future consumption at a high rate typically are simply not concerned with sustainability: the loss of well being of
future generations is outweighed by the gains to the present generation.
54. Further complexities are added to interdependencies: in the circumstances in which climate change turns out to be worse
than expected, much of the capital stock may turn out to be in the wrong place (e.g. under water).
55. There are some extreme cases—infinitely lived individuals, or finitely lived individuals with perfect altruism—in which
market prices would be of relevance; but these assumptions have little to do with the world in which we live.

54

The Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress Revisited

imposed might have large impacts on current values of interest rates and the relevant
risk premia.
213. Still, it is important for any society to form an assessment, no matter how imperfect,
about whether its current consumption or well-being is sustainable, and whether this is
coming at the expense of future generations.56 We can ascertain whether a society’s
wealth is increasing or decreasing (per capita). If (appropriately measured) it is
increasing, then presumably society can do in the future whatever it did today, i.e. it can
sustain its per-capita income. But we need a comprehensive measure of wealth, and we
need to be sure that the valuations are correct. A comprehensive measure obviously
includes measures of physical capital, human capital and natural capital (including the
environment). Changes in capital include those arising from investment in plant and
equipment, education, the depletion of natural resources, depreciation of physical
capital, and environmental degradation.
214. Accordingly, we believe that a good system of national accounts should report both a
level of consumption and a comprehensive measure of the change in wealth {C, ΔW}.
The task is difficult, because many components of wealth are not measured at all (i.e.
human capital) or are often ill-measured.
215. The current crisis highlights the problem of relying on market prices for the valuation of
wealth. Net wealth as measured was increasing in periods prior to the crisis, but that
was the consequence of a market failure. Private debt was increasing, but according to
the market, asset prices were increasing at a faster pace. A reliance on market prices
would have led to the conclusion that the high levels of pre-crisis consumption in many
countries were sustainable. The revaluation of wealth that occurred subsequently
showed that they were not. The ongoing controversy over mark to market accounting
shows that today, even ardent advocates of markets have lost faith in their valuations, at
least in the short run. The difficulty is finding an alternative.
216. Market prices fail to provide accurate and reliable estimates of the expected present
discounted value of future consumption (returns) not just because of the irrational
exuberance and pessimism to which markets are prone. Market prices may be highly
distorted, for instance, at one time putting too low a price on risk, and at another too
high a price.
217. The most serious distortions in market prices arise out of the failure to price scarce
environmental resources. The market today assigns no or a low price to carbon
emissions, and yet there is a broad scientific consensus that there is a real scarcity value.
The world is rapidly using up the available global “carbon space”, but those who are
using it are not being charged. The result is that the prices of all goods and services that
make use of this carbon space – essentially all goods and services – are being distorted.
56. What is relevant, of course, is not just the level of aggregate consumption, but also particular policies. There is, for instance,
concern that America’s health care system is unsustainable, in the sense that it seems to require an ever-increasing share of
GDP. Some economists use forecasts of future prices to estimate the necessary taxes that would have to be levied to sustain
it, or, in the absence of additional taxes, the magnitude of the debt. One has to be careful, however, using such naïve
extrapolations. Something will have to adjust – the policies are correctly identified as “non-sustainable”. But it is probably
wrong to infer that expenditures will simply increase in the way forecast. There are limits to the share of GDP that a society
will be willing to devote to medical care.

55

REFLECTIONS AND OVERVIEW

218. We need to take a comprehensive approach to the measurement of wealth, including all
assets and all liabilities. Liabilities include the costs of future waste disposal and
repairing environmental damage.
219. These adjustments for changes in wealth are even more important when it comes to
resource-dependent countries. Their stock of resources is being depleted, and their
wealth is increasing only if the proceeds are being reinvested, whether in physical,
human or financial capital.
220. While national income accounts have long taken account of the depreciation of physical
capital, there are serious problems in the measurement of depreciation (none of the
standard methodologies correspond to the theoretical construct of true economic
depreciation), and these problems may have become more serious, as we noted earlier,
with increases in the pace of innovation and the consequence increases in the rate of
obsolescence.
221. One commonly used measure of net national income entails simply adding up (with
appropriate prices) consumption and the change in wealth. “Green” measures of GDP/
NDP/NNP subtract from the standard measures the value of the depletion of natural
resources and environmental degradation. While such extensions are a move in the right
direction, they typically do not embrace a sufficiently comprehensive measure of
wealth. Valuing environmental inputs into the economic system is the (relatively) easier
step. Since these inputs are incorporated into products that are sold in the market place,
it is possible (in principle) to use direct means to assign a value for them based on
market principles. In contrast, as pollution emissions are outputs, there is no direct way
to assign a value to them. All the indirect methods of valuation will depend to some
extent on “what if” scenarios. Thus, translating valuations of degradation into
adjustments to macro-economic aggregates takes us beyond the realm of ex-post
accounting into a much more hypothetical situation. The very speculative nature of this
sort of accounting explains the great discomfort and strong resistance among many
accountants to this practice.
222. For a country that was on an unsustainable consumption path, an analysis employing a
comprehensive and accurate measure of wealth would show a time series of decreasing
net national income.57
223. Three remarks are in order. Even if we agree that the level of present patterns of
consumption is unsustainable, in view of the adverse effect on the environment, it does
not necessarily imply that future generations should consume less. Such a statement
would be true only if we assume that they will consume the same basket of goods. But
they may well change their consumption habits – because their tastes evolve, because
some new products appear and/or because of a change in relative prices due to the
increasing scarcity of natural resources. Indeed, these changes in prices are likely to
induce both innovations and changes in consumption patterns. Second, the price of a
resource near to exhaustion rises to infinity only if this resource has no substitute. And
57. For the world as a whole, as the resource approaches zero, unless there are substitutes, the price would approach infinity;
presumably, the ever-rising price would induce innovation and extreme conservation in the utilization of the resource, so
that the pace of utilization of the resource would be greatly reduced. (Many individual countries have, of course, seen the
exhaustion of particular resources, e.g. the UK’s supply of North Sea oil.)

56

The Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress Revisited

that depends on a number of phenomena, including technical progress, which are
impossible to ascertain today. Third, this analysis highlights the importance of risk –
and the valuation of risk.

VIII-3. What do we want to measure?
224. There have been many attempts at building indicators of sustainable development.
Some of them directly stem from an accounting framework (the Nordhaus-Tobin
approach) and are therefore familiar to economists or accountants. Many of these have
been based on the Samuelson-Hicks welfare approach. Some others are more
specifically environmental and have become very popular amongst NGOs and
environmentalists. Several statistical bodies or scholars have, in parallel, developed
eclectic approaches that combine several dimensions of sustainability, under the form
either of extensive dashboards or of so-called “composite” indicators that add up, in one
way or another, various indicators to form an “index”.
225. The situation therefore appears to be characterized by an excess bounty, rather than by
scarcity. But this is not necessarily good news, especially when different indicators
provide diverging messages about the sustainability of different economic models or
about the contributions of different countries to worldwide sustainability. This has been
a source of perplexity for public opinion and for policy makers: which indicators should
one focus upon, which should be priorities for further development? So far, a consensus
has not developed for any of the existing approaches.
226. What do we really want to measure? Since the Brundtland Report, the notion of
sustainable development has expanded to become an encompassing concept absorbing
all dimensions of present and future economic, social and environmental well-being.
The two first chapters of the Report have concentrated on the measure of current wellbeing. Here we are concerned with the sustainability of this well-being, or, what
amounts to the same thing, the “sustainable” component of “sustainable development”.
This question of durability can be expressed in the following terms: assuming we have
been able to assess what is the current level of well-being, the question is to know
whether the continuation of present trends allows (at least) the preservation of this
current level of well-being. It is why we have asserted that social progress in the long
run presupposes sustainability.
227. As a first guide for sorting out the many different approaches reviewed in our

Report, we separate these two notions, assessing current well-being and
assessing its durability or sustainability, because the two questions are
analytically distinct.
228. Some dashboards of sustainable development have mixed together measurement of
current well-being and of its sustainability. While dashboards are useful, we want to
select a limited number of indicators – a “micro” dashboard – including some indicators
specifically dedicated to the sustainability issue, based on a clear notion of what
sustainability means.
229. Composite indicators based on such eclectic dashboards raise similar problems, with
one additional one – the way in which their various items are weighted is arbitrary, with

57

REFLECTIONS AND OVERVIEW

consequences that are seldom made explicit.58 Such aggregation procedures are
sometimes presented as superior to the monetary aggregations that are used for building
economic indices, precisely because they are not linked to any form of market
valuation. Indeed, there are many reasons why market values cannot be trusted when
addressing sustainability issues, and more specifically their environmental component.
But monetary or not, an aggregation procedure always means putting relative values on
the items that are introduced in the index. The problem is not that these weighting
procedures are hidden, non-transparent or non-replicable: they are often very explicitly
presented by the authors of the indices – and this is one of the merits of this literature.
The problem is rather than their normative foundations or their societal implications are
seldom made explicit or justified.

VIII-4 Measuring our legacy to the future
230. As we have seen, the capacity of future generations to have standards of well-being at
least equal to ours depends upon whether we pass on to them sufficient amounts of all
those assets that matter for well-being. Let’s note W the “extended wealth” index that
would be used to quantify this stock of resources. Measuring sustainability amounts to
assessing whether this global stock (or particular components of it) is evolving
positively or negatively, i.e. computing current rates of change dW (or dWi). If this is
negative, downward adjustments in consumption or well-being will be required sooner
or later. This is exactly what one should understand by “non-sustainability”.
231. In our view, such a formulation of the sustainability issue has a strong potential for
providing the common language necessary for constructive debates between those
coming from very different fields and perspectives. Just to take one example, it fully
answers one of the longstanding objections made to GDP by environmentalists, i.e. the
fact that ecological catastrophes can increase GDP through their implied impact on
economic activity. In an extended wealth approach, an ecological catastrophe is
registered as a destruction of capital. This accounts for the fact that it decreases
sustainability by decreasing the resources available for generating well-being tomorrow.
This can be avoided only if some action is taken to repair the corresponding damage,
these actions being counted as positive investment.
232. Some environmentalists worry that the depletion of certain key resources that are
essential cannot be compensated for by, say, more investment in physical capital.
Economists respond that if that were the case, markets should reflect that scarcity by a
very high price, which would induce conservation of that resource and the development
of substitutes. Techno-optimists point out that since Malthus, there have been those
forecasting doom – whether due to a scarcity of land or of some other resource. So far,
this has not occurred. But environmentalists say that markets are short-sighted, and that
we have repeatedly seen their inability to take into account future effects.
233. This criticism holds, however, only when the indicators are computed at fixed prices.
But if a natural resource becomes crucial for human survival, and cannot be replaced by
other produced assets, a correct implementation of the index would posit a relative price
58. In contrast, market based indices use relative prices, which, when markets are competitive, reflect individuals’ marginal
valuations.

58

The Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress Revisited

for the natural resource that tends to infinity. In that case, no realistic change in other
assets will be able to restore sustainability. Appropriately constructed indices will
reflect the risk of such changes in relative prices.
234. Our Commission believes that, nonetheless, there are sufficient societal concerns about
certain key aspects of the depletion and degradation of our natural resources that
reporting what is happening to certain key physical stocks may be warranted.
235. A difficulty in discussions of sustainability using the extended wealth framework (as
conventionally employed) is posed by the apparent contradiction between its message
that we can easily compensate for the depletion of resources and the degradation of the
environment and the many arguments that have been developed in favour of strong and
rapid actions in several environmental domains, climatic change being the most
emblematic of them. The power of compounding can give the feeling that there will
always be sufficient money available to pay for unfavourable environmental impacts,
and that current problems are therefore more important. Simplistic uses of monetary
indices of sustainability (often incorrectly constructed, paying insufficient attention to
future potential risks) may seemingly provide some support to such a bias in favour of
the present. The approaches we recommend are designed to avoid such a bias; we
believe that it is imperative to pay due attention to the problems arising from the
depreciation of environmental assets that are essential to human well-being or even
survival.

a. “True saving”
236. Measures of “true savings” represent more comprehensive attempts at measuring
changes in wealth, using “correct” valuations. As we have emphasized, wealth includes
everything that can be transferred through time, whether privately or collectively
owned.
237. Interestingly, most approaches (including those described at length in Chapter 3 of the
main Report) do not rely on market valuations, simply because the presumption that
markets do not work for purposes of long-term intertemporal valuations is so strong.
They do not work well, even in the case of standard marketed goods, but even less well
in the area of the environment, which is the focus of so much of the concern about
sustainability.
238. It is also why we argue for a pragmatic approach that combines limited-scope
“synthetic” indicators (in that they aggregate over a wealth of items, like true savings)
to measure overconsumption with a few, well-chosen physical measures. We have,
however, reservations about very encompassing approaches – which, in our view, suffer
from their excessive ambition, e.g. summarizing current well-being and its
sustainability with a single number – as well as about those that focus on a long list of
separate resources, implicitly assuming no substitutability among them or between them
and other forms of capital.
239. We argue for an extended wealth framework. This requires information that is not often
available. Moreover, there is often a high degree of uncertainty about the appropriate
trade-offs (weights associated with the various components of an extended wealth
measure). We thus argue in favour of a multi-dimensional approach to sustainability. We

59

REFLECTIONS AND OVERVIEW

emphasize the problems raised by technological and other uncertainties, as well as those
raised by the international dimension of the sustainability issue. We suggest staying
with a modest approach, i.e. focusing the monetary aggregation on items for which
reasonable valuation techniques exist, such as physical capital, human capital and fossil
resources. This should be complemented with a limited set of physical and other nonmonetary indicators dealing with climate change and global warming, and biodiversity,
as well as the social capital and “institutional assets” that we transmit to future
generations.

b. Footprints
240. Although apparently quite different from “extended wealth” notions, various attempts at
measuring sustainability through the use of “footprints” are, in fact, also inspired by the
general approach of comparing the level of an existing stock with current consumption
flows and their induced effects on some dimensions of the environment. In this sense,
they may also be regarded as “wealth” measures in which the focus is exclusively on
natural capital, and the valuation convention differs in that no market prices are
explicitly used. The results are expressed not in terms of the conventional “money
metrics” but in terms of some physical metric (such as the total use of carbon, or the
land required to sustain consumption levels).
241. The Ecological Footprint (EF hereafter) measures “how much of the regenerative
capacity of the biosphere is used by human activities (consumption)”. It does so by
calculating the amount of biologically productive land and water area required to
support a given population at its current level of consumption and resource utilization.
A country’s Footprint (demand side) is the total area required to produce the food, fiber
and timber that it consumes, absorb the waste that it generates, and provide areas for its
infrastructures (built-up areas). On the supply side, “biocapacity is the productive
capacity of the biosphere and its ability to provide a flux of biological resources and
services useful to humanity”, as Moran, Wackernagel and their co-authors (2008)
phrased it.
242. The results are well-known and rather striking: since the mid-1980s, humanity’s
footprint has been larger than the planet's carrying capacity, and in 2003 humanity’s
total Footprint exceeded the Earth’s biocapacity by approximately 25 per cent (we
would have needed an extra 25% Planet to meet our needs, to put it informally). While
1.8 global hectares per person are available world-wide, Europeans use 4.9 global
hectares per person and North Americans use twice that amount, that is, much more
than the actual bio-capacities of these two geographical zones.
243. This index may be regarded as an extended account approach, even if its results are not
expressed in monetary terms. Indeed, this indicator shares with accounting approaches
the idea of reducing heterogeneous elements to one common measurement unit (the
global hectare, e.g one hectare with productivity equal to the average productivity of the
11.2 billion bioproductive hectares on Earth). It assumes the substitutability at least of
different forms of natural capital (demands on different natural capital goods are
additively assessed in terms of land area), but implicitly rejects notions that physical or
other forms of capital can substitute for natural capital. In fact, there is no virtue to any
saving or accumulation: not only does any positive ecological surplus (biocapacity

60

The Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress Revisited

exceeding ecological footprint) not entail an increase in some natural capital stock and
hence an improvement of the productive capacity in the future, but investments in
capital goods that might reduce future ecological footprints have an adverse effect
because of the demands that they impose on today’s ecological footprint.
244. The results of this and similar metrics are problematic for measuring a country’s own
sustainability – or would be relevant only in a world of autarky. Differences in resource
endowments provide one of the main motivations of trade. The fact that densely
populated (low biocapacity) countries like the Netherlands have ecological deficits
whilst sparsely populated (high biocapacity) countries like Finland enjoy a surplus can
be seen as part of a normal situation where the trade of goods is mutually beneficial
rather than an indicator of non-sustainability. It is better to consider EFs as an attempt to
assess the magnitude of global non-sustainability.
245. Less encompassing but more rigorously defined indicators, such as the “Carbon
Footprint” (CF), would seem better suited to assess a particular dimension of
sustainability, insofar as they are more clearly physical measures of a physical stock and
of changes in that stock. (Again, they are better as measures of global sustainability, and
there are complicated problems of assessment in general equilibrium models, e.g. in
evaluating the carbon used to produce each of the inputs that go into each product.
Marginal carbon utilizations may differ, for instance, from average utililization.
Moreover, measuring sustainability requires an assessment of future changes in
technology.)
246. One use of these indicators is to send strong messages concerning the over-utilization of
the absorbing capacity of our planet. Because these metrics can be calculated at any
level of disaggregation59, they can be a powerful instrument for monitoring behaviours
of individual actors.

c. Global perspectives
247. In a globalized world one needs to take a global perspective. This is obviously the case
(and well recognized) for global warming, but it is also true for other depletable and
renewable natural resources.
248. Taking a global perspective means that one cannot overlook the fact that some countries
are more vulnerable than others to the degradation of the global environment.
Regardless of where carbon gas is emitted, we know that climatic change has a strongly
uneven distribution of consequences on different countries. Does worldwide
sustainability mean the preservation of well-being for the average of the world
population, or for those of its members that are more directly confronted by the adverse
consequences of such an environmental threat? Whatever one’s views on the long-term
sustainability of the world’s current path, for the Maldives, Bangladesh, and the lowlying Pacific Island states, the current path is not sustainable.

59. Subject to the qualifications made in the previous paragraph.

61

REFLECTIONS AND OVERVIEW

d. Other dimensions of sustainability
249. While environmentalists have performed a service in calling our attention to
sustainability, the examples of non-sustainability resulting from excessive debt make it
clear that these sustainability issues are far broader. Here too the present crisis helps us
to understand other dimensions of sustainability, namely the human and social
dimensions. A major crisis such as the current one or that of 1997-1998 can have longterm effects on the future welfare of some categories of populations, in particular in
developing countries, as a result, for instance, of interrupted educations or malnutrition.
And in turn, these consequences may jeopardize the sustainability of the social and the
political system.
250. The discussion of sustainability serves to remind us that by looking at an economy
today, we get a very incomplete picture of complex dynamic processes. Earlier, we
emphasized the importance of the distribution of income. Again, we looked at a
“snapshot”, a picture at a moment in time. But what matters for individuals is their
lifetime income – especially if they can borrow to smooth out their income over time.
Societies are, and should be, concerned with social mobility across generations.
251. In the development literature, emphasis is placed not just on economic and
environmental sustainability, but also on political and social sustainability. We have no
good metrics, for these other important aspects of society. Still, an important aspect of
political sustainability is access to “voice” and social sustainability and equality of
opportunity. Metrics on these variables can and should be developed. (See also the
earlier discussion in Section XX)
252. An important warning should be sounded in closing. La Palisse would have said that a
necessary condition for sustainability is that a catastrophe should not arise that prevents
achieving sustainability. Climate change can precipitate the advent of such a
catastrophe. Such a catastrophe would change dramatically the world in which we live,
and therefore how we live—so much so that much of what we have said might seem
irrelevant. We thus badly need indicators measuring how close we are to such a
catastrophe. Our Report has been written by economists and social scientists who deal
with numbers describing our economy and our society. We thus rely on scientists on
climate change and other natural scientists to conceive these indicators of a potential
catastrophe in our physical surroundings. We simply do not have the expertise to do this
by ourselves.

62

The Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress Revisited

THE WAY AHEAD: CONCLUDING REMARKS
253. The Members of the Commission believe that our work has just begun. We are
convinced that what we measure and how we measure it makes a difference – for policy,
for judgments about what works and what doesn’t.
254. It should be obvious that no single number can summarize anything as complex and
variegated as “society”. But, inevitably, certain numbers – in particular GDP – have
taken center stage. Millions are spent forecasting what that number will be next month
or next year.
255. The members of the Commission agreed that such a number may be misleading if it
were applied to all purposes, and especially as a broader measure of societal
performance. We have described a number of reforms that, depending on the purpose of
the measure, would provide better metrics. Many of these reforms are attainable with
relatively little investment in the collection and analysis of statistical data. And we are
hopeful that our discussion of the strengths and limits of different metrics will lead to
more care in the use of each, and better selection of the use of appropriate metrics for
different purposes. For example, we have identified measures that are better adapted to
the measurement of the well-being of citizens in a country in a globalized world than
GDP; the evolution of median income is more telling about the representative agent
than per-capita GDP.
256. Measurement of “present” economic performance also includes an assessment of
“quality of life”. Quality of life includes the full range of factors that make life worth
living, including those that are not traded in markets and not captured by monetary
measures. While many of our measures are directed at ascertaining short-run
movements in the level of market activity, the Commission considers that the time has
come to make a clear move from measuring production to measuring welfare, to try to
close the gap between our measures of economic performance and widespread
perceptions of well-being. Building on existing research, it proposes new and credible
measures for at least some aspect of quality of life.
257. Our societies have become more concerned about the environment, as we have realized
that what we have been doing has placed our planet at risk. This realization reinforces
the importance of sustainability, and heightens the imperative for the development of
metrics that assess sustainability. While we have argued for the development of a
broader measure of extended wealth to assess sustainability, we believe that such an
approach should be supplemented with some physical measures.
258. We believe that a global debate around the issues and recommendations raised in the
Report provides an important venue for a discussion of societal values, for what we, as a
society, care about, and whether we are really striving for what is important
259. We hope that ours Report will provide the impetus not only for this broader discussion,
but also for on-going research into the development of better metrics that will contribute
to a better assessment of economic performance and social progress.

63


